1676 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: ülni
  EN TS: Sitting with a coffee? Vibes.
  hu TS: Egy kávéval ülni? Micsoda vibe.
  EN FS: Sitting with a book? Vibes.
  hu FS: Egy könyvvel ülni? Micsoda vibe.
  EN TP: sitting in an armchair
  hu TP: fotelben ülni
  EN FP: sitting at a desk
  hu FP: íróasztalnál ülni
1677 | city (noun): a large crowded area of streets and buildings | loc: város
  EN TS: They are not looking at the city.
  hu TS: Épp nem a várost nézik.
  EN FS: They are not looking at their phones.
  hu FS: Épp nem a telefonjukat nézik.
  EN TP: a city at dusk
  hu TP: város alkonyatkor
  EN FP: a city at noon
  hu FP: város délben
1679 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: templom
  EN TS: The temple is golden.
  hu TS: A templom arany színű.
  EN FS: The temple is silver.
  hu FS: A templom ezüst színű.
  EN TP: a temple by a pond
  hu TP: templom egy tó mellett
  EN FP: a temple in a city
  hu FP: templom egy városban
1681 | peacock (noun): a large bird with a long shiny blue-green tail | loc: páva
  EN TS: What a long tail, peacock!
  hu TS: Páva, milyen hosszú a farktollad!
  EN FS: What a short tail, peacock!
  hu FS: Páva, milyen rövid a farktollad!
  EN TP: a peacock on a branch
  hu TP: páva egy ágon
  EN FP: a peacock on the ground
  hu FP: páva a földön
1684 | mask (noun): a cover you wear over your face | loc: maszk
  EN TS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a mask now.
  hu TS: Már a Mona Lisa is maszkot hord.
  EN FS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a hat now.
  hu FS: Már a Mona Lisa is kalapot hord.
  EN TP: a white medical mask
  hu TP: fehér orvosi maszk
  EN FP: a mask for a party
  hu FP: bulis maszk
1685 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: tömeg
  EN TS: The crowd is running away!
  hu TS: A tömeg elmenekül!
  EN FS: The crowd is running inside!
  hu FS: A tömeg berohan!
  EN TP: a crowd fleeing the temple
  hu TP: a templomból menekülő tömeg
  EN FP: a crowd praying inside
  hu FP: bent imádkozó tömeg
1686 | charge (verb): to fill a phone or battery with electricity | loc: tölt
  EN TS: He is charging himself.
  hu TS: Saját magát tölti.
  EN FS: He is charging his phone.
  hu FS: A telefonját tölti.
  EN TP: charging from a wall socket
  hu TP: töltés a konnektorból
  EN FP: charging a car battery
  hu FP: autóakkumulátor töltése
1689 | jesus (noun): the central figure of the Christian faith | loc: Jézus
  EN TS: Jesus is standing by a cave.
  hu TS: Jézus egy barlang mellett áll.
  EN FS: Jesus is standing by a lake.
  hu FS: Jézus egy tó mellett áll.
  EN TP: Jesus by a cave
  hu TP: Jézus egy barlangnál
  EN FP: Jesus by the sea
  hu FP: Jézus a tengernél
1693 | knight (noun): a soldier in metal armour from the Middle Ages | loc: lovag
  EN TS: A knight is swinging a sword.
  hu TS: Egy lovag karddal suhint.
  EN FS: A knight is swinging an axe.
  hu FS: Egy lovag fejszével suhint.
  EN TP: a knight in armour
  hu TP: páncélos lovag
  EN FP: a knight on a horse
  hu FP: lovag lóháton
1694 | chief (noun): the leader of a group or tribe | loc: törzsfőnök
  EN TS: The chief wears a feather.
  hu TS: A törzsfőnök tollat visel.
  EN FS: The chief wears a crown.
  hu FS: A törzsfőnök koronát visel.
  EN TP: a chief with a feather
  hu TP: törzsfőnök tollal
  EN FP: a chief with a crown
  hu FP: törzsfőnök koronával
1695 | gun (noun): a weapon that fires a bullet at high speed | loc: pisztoly
  EN TS: She is holding a gun.
  hu TS: Pisztolyt tart a kezében.
  EN FS: She is holding a phone.
  hu FS: Telefont tart a kezében.
  EN TP: holding a gun down
  hu TP: lefelé tartott pisztoly
  EN FP: holding a gun up
  hu FP: felfelé tartott pisztoly
1696 | eagle (noun): a large strong bird that hunts | loc: sas
  EN TS: The eagle manages two chicks.
  hu TS: A sas két fiókát menedzsel.
  EN FS: The eagle manages four chicks.
  hu FS: A sas négy fiókát menedzsel.
  EN TP: an eagle above its nest
  hu TP: sas a fészke fölött
  EN FP: an eagle catching a fish
  hu FP: halat fogó sas
1697 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: legyező
  EN TS: Fan and kimono: very elegant.
  hu TS: Legyező és kimonó: nagyon elegáns.
  EN FS: Book and kimono: very elegant.
  hu FS: Könyv és kimonó: nagyon elegáns.
  EN TP: an open folding fan
  hu TP: nyitott legyező
  EN FP: an electric fan in summer
  hu FP: ventilátor nyáron
1699 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: úszni
  EN TS: Someone is swimming to the music.
  hu TS: Valaki a zenére úszik.
  EN FS: Someone is flying to the music.
  hu FS: Valaki a zenére repül.
  EN TP: swimming across calm water
  hu TP: átúszni a csendes vizet
  EN FP: swimming in a pool
  hu FP: úszni a medencében
1701 | lily (noun): a tall plant with big trumpet-shaped flowers | loc: liliom
  EN TS: A lily is growing from a jug.
  hu TS: Egy liliom nő ki egy kancsóból.
  EN FS: A rose is growing from a jug.
  hu FS: Egy rózsa nő ki egy kancsóból.
  EN TP: a lily in a jug
  hu TP: liliom egy kancsóban
  EN FP: a lily in a pond
  hu FP: liliom egy tóban
1703 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: olvasni
  EN TS: She is reading in the air.
  hu TS: A levegőben olvas.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in the air.
  hu FS: A levegőben alszik.
  EN TP: reading a glowing book
  hu TP: világító könyvet olvasni
  EN FP: reading a text message
  hu FP: üzenetet olvasni
1704 | christmas (noun): the winter holiday on 25 December | loc: karácsony
  EN TS: It says 'happy Christmas'.
  hu TS: Az áll rajta: „boldog karácsonyt”.
  EN FS: It says 'happy birthday'.
  hu FS: Az áll rajta: „boldog születésnapot”.
  EN TP: an old Christmas card
  hu TP: régi karácsonyi képeslap
  EN FP: an old Christmas tree
  hu FP: régi karácsonyfa
1706 | sunglasses (noun): dark spectacles that protect the eyes from the sun | loc: napszemüveg
  EN TS: Cool dog, cool sunglasses.
  hu TS: Menő kutya, menő napszemüveg.
  EN FS: Cool dog, cool hat.
  hu FS: Menő kutya, menő kalap.
  EN TP: a husky in sunglasses
  hu TP: husky napszemüvegben
  EN FP: sunglasses on a beach towel
  hu FP: napszemüveg a strandtörölközőn
1707 | cottage (noun): a small simple house in the countryside | loc: házikó
  EN TS: Plants are eating the cottage.
  hu TS: A növények megeszik a házikót.
  EN FS: Plants are eating the church.
  hu FS: A növények megeszik a templomot.
  EN TP: an overgrown stone cottage
  hu TP: benőtt kőházikó
  EN FP: a cottage by the sea
  hu FP: házikó a tengerparton
1709 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: tanár
  EN TS: The teacher is explaining.
  hu TS: A tanár magyaráz.
  EN FS: The teacher is sleeping.
  hu FS: A tanár alszik.
  EN TP: a teacher at the board
  hu TP: tanár a táblánál
  EN FP: a teacher at her desk
  hu FP: tanár az asztalánál
1710 | blackboard (noun): a dark wall surface teachers write on in chalk | loc: tábla
  EN TS: The blackboard is empty.
  hu TS: A tábla üres.
  EN FS: The blackboard is full.
  hu FS: A tábla tele van.
  EN TP: an empty blackboard
  hu TP: üres tábla
  EN FP: a blackboard full of notes
  hu FP: jegyzetekkel teli tábla
1711 | skeleton (noun): all the bones of a body together | loc: csontváz
  EN TS: The skeleton looks very happy.
  hu TS: A csontváz nagyon boldognak tűnik.
  EN FS: The skeleton looks very sad.
  hu FS: A csontváz nagyon szomorúnak tűnik.
  EN TP: a skeleton with a bow
  hu TP: csontváz masnival
  EN FP: a skeleton in a museum
  hu FP: csontváz a múzeumban
1713 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: toll
  EN TS: Hundreds of feathers on top.
  hu TS: Több száz toll a tetején.
  EN FS: Hundreds of flowers on top.
  hu FS: Több száz virág a tetején.
  EN TP: a headdress of long feathers
  hu TP: hosszú tollakból álló fejdísz
  EN FP: a pillow full of feathers
  hu FP: tollakkal teli párna
1716 | spacesuit (noun): the sealed suit an astronaut wears in space | loc: űrruha
  EN TS: The spacesuit is white.
  hu TS: Az űrruha fehér.
  EN FS: The spacesuit is orange.
  hu FS: Az űrruha narancssárga.
  EN TP: a white spacesuit
  hu TP: fehér űrruha
  EN FP: a spacesuit on a hanger
  hu FP: űrruha a vállfán
1717 | instrument (noun): an object you play to make music | loc: hangszer
  EN TS: This instrument is a violin.
  hu TS: Ez a hangszer egy hegedű.
  EN FS: This instrument is a guitar.
  hu FS: Ez a hangszer egy gitár.
  EN TP: a string instrument
  hu TP: vonós hangszer
  EN FP: a wind instrument
  hu FP: fúvós hangszer
1718 | calm (adjective): quiet, relaxed and not worried at all | loc: nyugodt
  EN TS: The Buddha is 100 % calm.
  hu TS: A Buddha 100%-ig nyugodt.
  EN FS: The Buddha is 100 % angry.
  hu FS: A Buddha 100%-ig dühös.
  EN TP: a calm face
  hu TP: nyugodt arc
  EN FP: a calm sea
  hu FP: nyugodt tenger
1724 | hold (verb): to have something in your hands or grip | loc: tartani | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is holding the moon!
  hu TS: A holdat tartja!
  EN FS: She is holding the sun!
  hu FS: A napot tartja!
  EN TP: holding the moon
  hu TP: a holdat tartva
  EN FP: holding a poppy
  hu FP: pipacsot tartva
1725 | cross (noun): two crossed beams used to crucify someone | loc: kereszt
  EN TS: A cross lies on the ground.
  hu TS: Egy kereszt fekszik a földön.
  EN FS: A ladder lies on the ground.
  hu FS: Egy létra fekszik a földön.
  EN TP: a cross on the ground
  hu TP: kereszt a földön
  EN FP: a cross on a church
  hu FP: kereszt egy templomon
1726 | cape (noun): a loose sleeveless coat hanging from the shoulders | loc: köpeny
  EN TS: She is swirling a red cape.
  hu TS: Piros köpenyt pörget.
  EN FS: She is swirling a red scarf.
  hu FS: Piros sálat pörget.
  EN TP: swirling a red cape
  hu TP: piros köpenyt pörgetve
  EN FP: wearing a cape and mask
  hu FP: köpenyben és maszkban
1728 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: legyező
  EN TS: Red fan up, leg up!
  hu TS: Piros legyező fel, láb fel!
  EN FS: Red hat up, leg up!
  hu FS: Piros kalap fel, láb fel!
  EN TP: waving a red fan
  hu TP: piros legyezőt lengetve
  EN FP: a fan on the ceiling
  hu FP: mennyezeti ventilátor
1729 | pet (noun): an animal kept at home for company | loc: háziállat
  EN TS: She has two pets.
  hu TS: Két háziállata van.
  EN FS: She has three pets.
  hu FS: Három háziállata van.
  EN TP: a girl with her pets
  hu TP: lány a háziállataival
  EN FP: a girl buying a pet
  hu FP: lány háziállatot vesz
1731 | arrow (noun): the thin feathered stick you shoot from a bow | loc: nyíl
  EN TS: An arrow hit her flag!
  hu TS: Egy nyíl eltalálta a zászlaját!
  EN FS: An arrow hit her horse!
  hu FS: Egy nyíl eltalálta a lovát!
  EN TP: arrows in a flag
  hu TP: nyilak egy zászlóban
  EN FP: arrows in a target
  hu FP: nyilak egy céltáblában
1733 | elf (noun): a magical creature with pointed ears | loc: tünde
  EN TS: Guess what the elf is holding? A light.
  hu TS: Na, mit tart a tünde? Egy fényt.
  EN FS: Guess what the elf is holding? A sword.
  hu FS: Na, mit tart a tünde? Egy kardot.
  EN TP: an elf with pointed ears
  hu TP: hegyes fülű tünde
  EN FP: an elf with a bow
  hu FP: tünde íjjal
1734 | superhero (noun): a caped character with special powers | loc: szuperhős
  EN TS: This superhero is Spider-Man.
  hu TS: Ez a szuperhős Pókember.
  EN FS: This superhero is Batman.
  hu FS: Ez a szuperhős Batman.
  EN TP: a superhero in a mask
  hu TP: maszkos szuperhős
  EN FP: a superhero with a cape
  hu FP: köpenyes szuperhős
1738 | veil (noun): a piece of cloth that covers the head | loc: fátyol
  EN TS: She wears a long dark veil.
  hu TS: Hosszú sötét fátylat visel.
  EN FS: She wears a long white veil.
  hu FS: Hosszú fehér fátylat visel.
  EN TP: a long dark veil
  hu TP: hosszú sötét fátyol
  EN FP: a wedding veil
  hu FP: menyasszonyi fátyol
1741 | emperor (noun): the man who rules a whole empire | loc: császár
  EN TS: The emperor wears a wreath.
  hu TS: A császár babérkoszorút visel.
  EN FS: The emperor wears a crown.
  hu FS: A császár koronát visel.
  EN TP: an emperor with a wreath
  hu TP: császár babérkoszorúval
  EN FP: an emperor on a horse
  hu FP: császár lóháton
1742 | shield (noun): a flat piece of armour held for protection | loc: pajzs
  EN TS: The angel is holding a shield.
  hu TS: Az angyal pajzsot tart.
  EN FS: The angel is holding a sword.
  hu FS: Az angyal kardot tart.
  EN TP: a large round shield
  hu TP: nagy kerek pajzs
  EN FP: a shield on the ground
  hu FP: pajzs a földön
1743 | italy (noun): a country in southern Europe, home of pizza | loc: Olaszország
  EN TS: Ice cream in Italy? Of course.
  hu TS: Fagyi Olaszországban? Naná.
  EN FS: Pizza in Italy? Of course.
  hu FS: Pizza Olaszországban? Naná.
  EN TP: a leaning tower in Italy
  hu TP: ferde torony Olaszországban
  EN FP: a pizza oven in Italy
  hu FP: pizzakemence Olaszországban
1747 | tent (noun): a shelter of cloth stretched over poles | loc: sátor
  EN TS: Best tent spot ever!
  hu TS: Tökéletes hely a sátornak!
  EN FS: Best beach spot ever!
  hu FS: Tökéletes hely a strandolásnak!
  EN TP: a tent on a hill
  hu TP: sátor egy dombon
  EN FP: a tent on a beach
  hu FP: sátor a tengerparton
1751 | sign (noun): a big board that shows advertisements | loc: tábla
  EN TS: Each sign shows a landscape.
  hu TS: Minden tábla egy tájat mutat.
  EN FS: Each sign shows a city.
  hu FS: Minden tábla egy várost mutat.
  EN TP: arrow signs with landscapes
  hu TP: nyíl alakú táblák tájképekkel
  EN FP: arrow signs with prices
  hu FP: nyíl alakú táblák árakkal
1752 | windmill (noun): a building with big sails turned by the wind | loc: szélmalom
  EN TS: The windmill windows are lit.
  hu TS: A szélmalom ablakai világítanak.
  EN FS: The windmill windows are open.
  hu FS: A szélmalom ablakai nyitva vannak.
  EN TP: a windmill by a lake
  hu TP: szélmalom egy tó mellett
  EN FP: a windmill in a field
  hu FP: szélmalom egy mezőn
1756 | argue (verb): to speak angrily with someone you disagree with | loc: veszekedni
  EN TS: They are arguing on the phone.
  hu TS: Telefonon veszekednek.
  EN FS: They are singing on the phone.
  hu FS: Telefonon énekelnek.
  EN TP: arguing on the phone
  hu TP: telefonon veszekedni
  EN FP: arguing in the kitchen
  hu FP: a konyhában veszekedni
1757 | blossom (noun): a flower on a tree, like cherry blossom | loc: virág
  EN TS: Music under the blossoms? Romantic.
  hu TS: Zene a virágok alatt? Romantikus.
  EN FS: Dancing under the blossoms? Romantic.
  hu FS: Tánc a virágok alatt? Romantikus.
  EN TP: pink cherry blossoms
  hu TP: rózsaszín cseresznyevirágok
  EN FP: cherry blossom tea
  hu FP: cseresznyevirág-tea
1762 | whale (noun): a huge sea animal that breathes air | loc: bálna
  EN TS: A man is falling into a whale!
  hu TS: Egy férfi bálnába zuhan!
  EN FS: A man is falling into a boat!
  hu FS: Egy férfi csónakba zuhan!
  EN TP: the mouth of a whale
  hu TP: egy bálna szája
  EN FP: a whale in an aquarium
  hu FP: bálna egy akváriumban
1765 | greedy (adjective): wanting far more money than you need | loc: kapzsi
  EN TS: So greedy! Hands off the gold!
  hu TS: De kapzsi! Kezeket el az aranytól!
  EN FS: So greedy! Hands off the cake!
  hu FS: De kapzsi! Kezeket el a tortától!
  EN TP: a greedy man with coins
  hu TP: kapzsi férfi érmékkel
  EN FP: a greedy dog with food
  hu FP: kapzsi kutya kajával
1766 | blackberry (noun): a dark fruit made of many little parts | loc: szeder
  EN TS: Black and red blackberries.
  hu TS: Fekete és piros szedrek.
  EN FS: Black and green blackberries.
  hu FS: Fekete és zöld szedrek.
  EN TP: ripe blackberries on a branch
  hu TP: érett szeder egy ágon
  EN FP: blackberries in a pie
  hu FP: szeder egy pitében
1777 | banjo (noun): a round-bodied string instrument | loc: bendzsó
  EN TS: This dude is playing the banjo.
  hu TS: Ez a csávó bendzsón játszik.
  EN FS: This dude is playing the drums.
  hu FS: Ez a csávó dobon játszik.
  EN TP: playing a banjo
  hu TP: bendzsón játszani
  EN FP: tuning a banjo
  hu FP: bendzsót hangolni
1779 | chain (noun): a row of metal rings joined together | loc: lánc
  EN TS: His chain is out of control!
  hu TS: Elszabadult a lánca!
  EN FS: His rope is out of control!
  hu FS: Elszabadult a kötele!
  EN TP: a chain whipping around him
  hu TP: körülötte csapkodó lánc
  EN FP: a chain around his neck
  hu FP: lánc a nyakában
1780 | bike (noun): a vehicle with two wheels that you pedal | loc: bicikli
  EN TS: A dog is chasing his bike!
  hu TS: Egy kutya üldözi a biciklijét!
  EN FS: A cat is chasing his bike!
  hu FS: Egy macska üldözi a biciklijét!
  EN TP: a bike ride downhill
  hu TP: biciklivel lefelé a lejtőn
  EN FP: a bike ride uphill
  hu FP: biciklivel felfelé a lejtőn
1781 | halloween (noun): the autumn night of scary costumes and pumpkins | loc: Halloween
  EN TS: Halloween every day in this house.
  hu TS: Ebben a házban minden nap Halloween van.
  EN FS: Halloween every day in this castle.
  hu FS: Ebben a kastélyban minden nap Halloween van.
  EN TP: a Halloween haunted house
  hu TP: halloweeni kísértetház
  EN FP: a Halloween party at school
  hu FP: halloweeni buli a suliban
1783 | child (noun): a young person, a boy or a girl | loc: gyerek
  EN TS: Four children, one lap, a hug for each child.
  hu TS: Négy gyerek, egy öl, minden gyereknek egy ölelés.
  EN FS: Four children, one lap, a gift for each child.
  hu FS: Négy gyerek, egy öl, minden gyereknek egy ajándék.
  EN TP: a man hugging each child
  hu TP: férfi minden gyereket megölel
  EN FP: a man teaching each child
  hu FP: férfi minden gyereket tanít
1785 | beautiful (adjective): delighting the senses, very nice to look at | loc: gyönyörű
  EN TS: This is a beautiful drawing.
  hu TS: Ez egy gyönyörű rajz.
  EN FS: This is a beautiful photo.
  hu FS: Ez egy gyönyörű fotó.
  EN TP: a beautiful portrait
  hu TP: gyönyörű portré
  EN FP: a beautiful sunset
  hu FP: gyönyörű naplemente
1786 | meteor (noun): a space rock that burns as it falls | loc: meteor
  EN TS: Meteors are falling like rain.
  hu TS: Esőként hullanak a meteorok.
  EN FS: Leaves are falling like rain.
  hu FS: Esőként hullanak a levelek.
  EN TP: meteors raining down
  hu TP: zuhogó meteorok
  EN FP: a meteor in a museum
  hu FP: meteor egy múzeumban
1787 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: utcai lámpa
  EN TS: Red scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  hu TS: Piros sál egy utcai lámpa alatt. Stílusos.
  EN FS: Blue scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  hu FS: Kék sál egy utcai lámpa alatt. Stílusos.
  EN TP: a glowing streetlight
  hu TP: világító utcai lámpa
  EN FP: a broken streetlight
  hu FP: törött utcai lámpa
1788 | monster (noun): a frightening creature that is not real | loc: szörny
  EN TS: A sea monster with passengers!
  hu TS: Egy tengeri szörny utasokkal!
  EN FS: A sea turtle with passengers!
  hu FS: Egy tengeri teknős utasokkal!
  EN TP: a sea monster rising
  hu TP: felemelkedő tengeri szörny
  EN FP: a monster under the bed
  hu FP: szörny az ágy alatt
1792 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: építeni
  EN TS: They are building a tower.
  hu TS: Egy tornyot építenek.
  EN FS: They are building a ship.
  hu FS: Egy hajót építenek.
  EN TP: to build a huge tower
  hu TP: hatalmas tornyot építeni
  EN FP: to build a small house
  hu FP: kis házat építeni
1794 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: toll
  EN TS: So many peacock feathers!
  hu TS: Mennyi pávatoll!
  EN FS: So many swan feathers!
  hu FS: Mennyi hattyútoll!
  EN TP: shimmering peacock feathers
  hu TP: csillogó pávatollak
  EN FP: a feather in a pillow
  hu FP: toll egy párnában
1799 | cello (noun): a large string instrument played sitting down | loc: cselló
  EN TS: The cello is the largest one.
  hu TS: A cselló a legnagyobb.
  EN FS: The violin is the largest one.
  hu FS: A hegedű a legnagyobb.
  EN TP: a large dark cello
  hu TP: nagy, sötét cselló
  EN FP: a small dark cello
  hu FP: kicsi, sötét cselló
1800 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: elbújni | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc elbújni is intransitive (hide oneself); TS uses elrejteni for "hiding a smile"
  EN TS: They are hiding a smile.
  hu TS: Egy mosolyt rejtenek el.
  EN FS: They are hiding a phone.
  hu FS: Egy telefont rejtenek el.
  EN TP: hiding behind a book
  hu TP: elbújni egy könyv mögött
  EN FP: hiding under a table
  hu FP: elbújni az asztal alatt
1802 | note (noun): a sign for a single sound in written music | loc: hangjegy
  EN TS: Notes are pouring out of the guitar!
  hu TS: Hangjegyek ömlenek a gitárból!
  EN FS: Coins are pouring out of the guitar!
  hu FS: Érmék ömlenek a gitárból!
  EN TP: a waterfall of notes
  hu TP: hangjegyek vízesése
  EN FP: a stack of notes
  hu FP: egy halom jegyzet
1803 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: dobni
  EN TS: He is going to throw the ball.
  hu TS: Mindjárt eldobja a labdát.
  EN FS: He is going to kick the ball.
  hu FS: Mindjárt belerúg a labdába.
  EN TP: about to throw the ball
  hu TP: labdát dobni készül
  EN FP: to throw a party
  hu FP: házibulit tartani
1806 | bun (noun): hair twisted into a round knot on the head | loc: konty
  EN TS: Two buns? She is so trendy.
  hu TS: Két konty? Nagyon trendi.
  EN FS: Two bows? She is so trendy.
  hu FS: Két masni? Nagyon trendi.
  EN TP: hair in two round buns
  hu TP: két kerek konty
  EN FP: two buns on a plate
  hu FP: két zsemle egy tányéron
1807 | skull (noun): the bones that form the head | loc: koponya
  EN TS: Skulls are floating around her.
  hu TS: Koponyák lebegnek körülötte.
  EN FS: Hearts are floating around her.
  hu FS: Szívek lebegnek körülötte.
  EN TP: skulls in pink flames
  hu TP: koponyák rózsaszín lángokban
  EN FP: skulls on a pirate flag
  hu FP: koponyák egy kalózzászlón
1808 | headset (noun): a device worn on the head over eyes or ears | loc: headset
  EN TS: His headset is huge, bro.
  hu TS: Tesó, a headsete óriási.
  EN FS: His hat is huge, bro.
  hu FS: Tesó, a sapkája óriási.
  EN TP: a chunky headset
  hu TP: masszív headset
  EN FP: a headset on a pilot
  hu FP: headset egy pilótán
1811 | raincoat (noun): a waterproof coat you wear in the rain | loc: esőkabát
  EN TS: The raincoat is doing its job.
  hu TS: Az esőkabát hozza az elvárt teljesítményt.
  EN FS: The umbrella is doing its job.
  hu FS: Az esernyő hozza az elvárt teljesítményt.
  EN TP: a long yellow raincoat
  hu TP: hosszú sárga esőkabát
  EN FP: a raincoat on a hook
  hu FP: esőkabát egy fogason
1812 | look (verb): to turn your eyes toward something | loc: nézni
  EN TS: The cat is looking out too.
  hu TS: A macska is kifelé néz.
  EN FS: The dog is looking out too.
  hu FS: A kutya is kifelé néz.
  EN TP: looking out of the window
  hu TP: kinézni az ablakon
  EN FP: to look after a cat
  hu FP: macskára vigyázni
1823 | lonely (adjective): sad because you are all alone | loc: magányos
  EN TS: She feels lonely tonight.
  hu TS: Ma este magányosnak érzi magát.
  EN FS: She feels lonely this morning.
  hu FS: Ma reggel magányosnak érzi magát.
  EN TP: lonely on a balcony
  hu TP: magányosan egy erkélyen
  EN FP: lonely in a crowd
  hu FP: magányosan a tömegben
1827 | math (noun): the study of numbers and shapes | loc: matek
  EN TS: The cat hates math.
  hu TS: A macska utálja a matekot.
  EN FS: The dog hates math.
  hu FS: A kutya utálja a matekot.
  EN TP: walls covered in math
  hu TP: matekkal teleírt falak
  EN FP: math books on the floor
  hu FP: matekkönyvek a padlón
1831 | light bulb (noun): a glass ball in a lamp that glows when switched on | loc: izzó
  EN TS: A cabin is in the light bulb.
  hu TS: Egy faház van az izzóban.
  EN FS: A cabin is in the teacup.
  hu FS: Egy faház van a teáscsészében.
  EN TP: a snowy light bulb
  hu TP: havas izzó
  EN FP: a broken light bulb
  hu FP: törött izzó
1832 | take a photo (phrase): to make a picture with a camera or phone | loc: fényképet készíteni
  EN TS: She is taking a photo. Cool!
  hu TS: Fényképet készít. Menő!
  EN FS: She is making a call. Cool!
  hu FS: Telefonál. Menő!
  EN TP: taking a photo at night
  hu TP: fényképet készíteni éjjel
  EN FP: taking a photo indoors
  hu FP: fényképet készíteni bent
1833 | lean (verb): to rest your body sideways on something | loc: nekitámaszkodni
  EN TS: He is leaning on his guitar.
  hu TS: Nekitámaszkodik a gitárjának.
  EN FS: He is leaning on his piano.
  hu FS: Nekitámaszkodik a zongorájának.
  EN TP: leaning on a guitar
  hu TP: nekitámaszkodni egy gitárnak
  EN FP: leaning on a tree
  hu FP: nekitámaszkodni egy fának
1834 | teach (verb): to help someone learn a skill or subject | loc: tanítani
  EN TS: A god is teaching a warrior.
  hu TS: Egy isten egy harcost tanít.
  EN FS: A god is teaching a child.
  hu FS: Egy isten egy gyereket tanít.
  EN TP: teaching a warrior
  hu TP: harcost tanítani
  EN FP: teaching a crowd
  hu FP: tömeget tanítani
1840 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: gép
  EN TS: A giant machine made of gears!
  hu TS: Egy óriási gép fogaskerekekből!
  EN FS: A giant machine made of wood!
  hu FS: Egy óriási gép fából!
  EN TP: a machine of rusty gears
  hu TP: rozsdás fogaskerekekből álló gép
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  hu FP: kávégép
1843 | neighborhood (noun): the streets and houses around your home | loc: környék
  EN TS: A snowy neighborhood at night.
  hu TS: Havas környék éjjel.
  EN FS: A snowy neighborhood at noon.
  hu FS: Havas környék délben.
  EN TP: a snowy neighborhood
  hu TP: havas környék
  EN FP: a neighborhood party
  hu FP: környékbeli buli
1846 | crane (noun): a large white bird with a long neck and legs | loc: daru
  EN TS: A crane is flying by the sun.
  hu TS: Egy daru repül a nap mellett.
  EN FS: A crane is flying by the moon.
  hu FS: Egy daru repül a hold mellett.
  EN TP: a flying white crane
  hu TP: repülő fehér daru
  EN FP: a crane lifting boxes
  hu FP: dobozokat emelő daru
1847 | christmas tree (noun): a pine decorated with lights for the holidays | loc: karácsonyfa
  EN TS: I count three Christmas trees.
  hu TS: Három karácsonyfát számolok.
  EN FS: I count five Christmas trees.
  hu FS: Öt karácsonyfát számolok.
  EN TP: three little Christmas trees
  hu TP: három kis karácsonyfa
  EN FP: a Christmas tree with gifts
  hu FP: karácsonyfa ajándékokkal
1849 | magic (noun): power that makes impossible things happen | loc: varázslat
  EN TS: Her magic is glowing!
  hu TS: Ragyog a varázslata!
  EN FS: Her hair is glowing!
  hu FS: Ragyog a haja!
  EN TP: glowing blue magic
  hu TP: ragyogó kék varázslat
  EN FP: a magic card trick
  hu FP: kártyás bűvésztrükk
1851 | valley (noun): the low land between mountains | loc: völgy
  EN TS: Mist swallows the valleys.
  hu TS: A köd elnyeli a völgyeket.
  EN FS: Snow swallows the valleys.
  hu FS: A hó elnyeli a völgyeket.
  EN TP: mist in the valley
  hu TP: köd a völgyben
  EN FP: a valley full of houses
  hu FP: házakkal teli völgy
1853 | dragon (noun): a huge scaly beast from old stories | loc: sárkány
  EN TS: The dragon is breathing fire.
  hu TS: A sárkány tüzet okád.
  EN FS: The dragon is breathing ice.
  hu FS: A sárkány jeget okád.
  EN TP: a small white dragon
  hu TP: kis fehér sárkány
  EN FP: a big green dragon
  hu FP: nagy zöld sárkány
1854 | string (noun): one of the thin wires you pluck on a guitar | loc: húr
  EN TS: The guitar has white strings.
  hu TS: A gitárnak fehér húrjai vannak.
  EN FS: The guitar has black strings.
  hu FS: A gitárnak fekete húrjai vannak.
  EN TP: white strings on a guitar
  hu TP: fehér húrok egy gitáron
  EN FP: white strings on a kite
  hu FP: fehér zsinór egy papírsárkányon
1855 | tail (noun): the part at the back end of an animal's body | loc: farok
  EN TS: The peacock has a huge tail!
  hu TS: A páva farka óriási!
  EN FS: The peacock has a short tail!
  hu FS: A páva farka rövid!
  EN TP: a peacock showing its tail
  hu TP: a farkát széttáró páva
  EN FP: a peacock hiding its tail
  hu FP: a farkát rejtő páva
1856 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: pici
  EN TS: The figure is tiny. The sky is big.
  hu TS: Az alak pici. Az ég nagy.
  EN FS: The figure is huge. The sky is big.
  hu FS: Az alak óriási. Az ég nagy.
  EN TP: a tiny figure on grass
  hu TP: pici alak a füvön
  EN FP: a tiny shelf figure
  hu FP: pici polcfigura
1857 | easter (noun): the spring holiday when Christians remember Jesus | loc: húsvét
  EN TS: This is an Easter poster.
  hu TS: Ez egy húsvéti plakát.
  EN FS: This is a Christmas poster.
  hu FS: Ez egy karácsonyi plakát.
  EN TP: an Easter poster
  hu TP: húsvéti plakát
  EN FP: an Easter egg hunt
  hu FP: húsvéti tojáskeresés
1858 | scarf (noun): a long piece of cloth you wear around your neck | loc: sál
  EN TS: The child has a long scarf and a big balloon.
  hu TS: A gyereknél hosszú sál és nagy lufi van.
  EN FS: The child has a long sword and a big balloon.
  hu FS: A gyereknél hosszú kard és nagy lufi van.
  EN TP: a long striped scarf
  hu TP: hosszú csíkos sál
  EN FP: a scarf in a drawer
  hu FP: sál egy fiókban
1860 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: halom
  EN TS: His head is a stack of books.
  hu TS: A feje egy halom könyv.
  EN FS: His head is a stack of plates.
  hu FS: A feje egy halom tányér.
  EN TP: a stack of books
  hu TP: egy halom könyv
  EN FP: a stack of boxes
  hu FP: egy halom doboz
1861 | antique (adjective): old, valuable and from an earlier time | loc: antik
  EN TS: This antique seat has a swan.
  hu TS: Ezen az antik széken hattyú van.
  EN FS: This antique seat has a lion.
  hu FS: Ezen az antik széken oroszlán van.
  EN TP: an antique carved seat
  hu TP: antik faragott szék
  EN FP: an antique carved clock
  hu FP: antik faragott óra
1862 | vase (noun): a container you put flowers in | loc: váza
  EN TS: The vase has pink roses.
  hu TS: A vázában rózsaszín rózsák vannak.
  EN FS: The vase has white roses.
  hu FS: A vázában fehér rózsák vannak.
  EN TP: a grey classical vase
  hu TP: szürke klasszikus váza
  EN FP: a broken classical vase
  hu FP: törött klasszikus váza
1863 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: lógni
  EN TS: The swing hangs from the moon!
  hu TS: A hinta a holdról lóg!
  EN FS: The swing hangs from a tree!
  hu FS: A hinta egy fáról lóg!
  EN TP: hanging from the moon
  hu TP: a holdról lógva
  EN FP: hanging from a tree
  hu FP: egy fáról lógva
1865 | fin (noun): the thin part a fish uses to swim | loc: uszony
  EN TS: Those blue fins? Pure fashion.
  hu TS: Azok a kék uszonyok? Maga a divat.
  EN FS: Those red fins? Pure fashion.
  hu FS: Azok a piros uszonyok? Maga a divat.
  EN TP: big flowing fins
  hu TP: nagy, lebegő uszonyok
  EN FP: fins on a diver
  hu FP: uszony egy búváron
1866 | spy (noun): a person who secretly finds out information | loc: kém
  EN TS: Sunglasses and a gun: a classic spy.
  hu TS: Napszemüveg és pisztoly: klasszikus kém.
  EN FS: Sunglasses and a knife: a classic spy.
  hu FS: Napszemüveg és kés: klasszikus kém.
  EN TP: a spy with a pistol
  hu TP: kém pisztollyal
  EN FP: a spy with a camera
  hu FP: kém fényképezőgéppel
1868 | justice (noun): fair treatment of people by the law | loc: igazságszolgáltatás
  EN TS: Justice needs a lot of heavy books.
  hu TS: Az igazságszolgáltatásnak rengeteg nehéz könyv kell.
  EN FS: Justice needs a lot of candles.
  hu FS: Az igazságszolgáltatásnak rengeteg gyertya kell.
  EN TP: the scales of justice
  hu TP: az igazságszolgáltatás mérlege
  EN FP: the sword of justice
  hu FP: az igazságszolgáltatás kardja
1870 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: haj
  EN TS: Her hair reaches her feet!
  hu TS: A haja a lábáig ér!
  EN FS: Her hair reaches her chin!
  hu FS: A haja az álláig ér!
  EN TP: very long dark hair
  hu TP: nagyon hosszú sötét haj
  EN FP: a hair in the soup
  hu FP: hajszál a levesben
1871 | glow (verb): to shine with a soft light | loc: ragyog
  EN TS: Her eye is glowing white.
  hu TS: Fehéren ragyog a szeme.
  EN FS: Her eye is glowing red.
  hu FS: Pirosan ragyog a szeme.
  EN TP: an eye glowing white
  hu TP: fehéren ragyogó szem
  EN FP: a lamp glowing white
  hu FP: fehéren ragyogó lámpa
1872 | black (adjective): having the darkest color, like night | loc: fekete
  EN TS: The black cat loves books.
  hu TS: A fekete macska imádja a könyveket.
  EN FS: The white cat loves books.
  hu FS: A fehér macska imádja a könyveket.
  EN TP: a black cat on books
  hu TP: fekete macska könyveken
  EN FP: a black cat outside
  hu FP: fekete macska kint
1874 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: móló
  EN TS: They are sitting on the pier.
  hu TS: A mólón ülnek.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the boat.
  hu FS: A hajón ülnek.
  EN TP: sitting on a pier
  hu TP: egy mólón ülni
  EN FP: sitting on a bridge
  hu FP: egy hídon ülni
1876 | fishbowl (noun): a round glass bowl where pet fish live | loc: gömbakvárium
  EN TS: Cheap helmet: a fishbowl.
  hu TS: Olcsó sisak: egy gömbakvárium.
  EN FS: Cheap helmet: a bucket.
  hu FS: Olcsó sisak: egy vödör.
  EN TP: a fishbowl on her head
  hu TP: gömbakvárium a fején
  EN FP: a fishbowl on the table
  hu FP: gömbakvárium az asztalon
1878 | invisible (adjective): impossible to see with your eyes | loc: láthatatlan
  EN TS: His head is invisible!
  hu TS: A feje láthatatlan!
  EN FS: His suit is invisible!
  hu FS: Az öltönye láthatatlan!
  EN TP: an invisible head
  hu TP: láthatatlan fej
  EN FP: an invisible hand
  hu FP: láthatatlan kéz
1879 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: kupola
  EN TS: The dome shines like gold.
  hu TS: A kupola aranyként ragyog.
  EN FS: The dome shines like silver.
  hu FS: A kupola ezüstként ragyog.
  EN TP: a golden dome
  hu TP: arany kupola
  EN FP: a glass dome
  hu FP: üvegkupola
1880 | invention (noun): a new machine that someone has created | loc: találmány
  EN TS: Best invention ever: a flying ship.
  hu TS: Minden idők legjobb találmánya: egy repülő hajó.
  EN FS: Best invention ever: a flying car.
  hu FS: Minden idők legjobb találmánya: egy repülő autó.
  EN TP: a flying invention
  hu TP: repülő találmány
  EN FP: an invention on wheels
  hu FP: kerekes találmány
1881 | meditate (verb): to sit quietly and calm your mind | loc: meditálni
  EN TS: She is meditating calmly.
  hu TS: Nyugodtan meditál.
  EN FS: She is sleeping calmly.
  hu FS: Nyugodtan alszik.
  EN TP: meditating in lotus position
  hu TP: lótuszülésben meditálni
  EN FP: meditating before an exam
  hu FP: vizsga előtt meditálni
1883 | hen (noun): a female chicken | loc: tyúk
  EN TS: The hens are eating outside.
  hu TS: A tyúkok kint esznek.
  EN FS: The hens are eating inside.
  hu FS: A tyúkok bent esznek.
  EN TP: hens in a farmyard
  hu TP: tyúkok a baromfiudvarban
  EN FP: hens in a kitchen
  hu FP: tyúkok a konyhában
1884 | reflection (noun): the mirror image seen in water or glass | loc: tükröződés
  EN TS: The reflection is upside down.
  hu TS: A tükröződés fejjel lefelé áll.
  EN FS: The reflection is very blurry.
  hu FS: A tükröződés nagyon elmosódott.
  EN TP: a reflection in still water
  hu TP: tükröződés a csendes vízben
  EN FP: a reflection in a mirror
  hu FP: tükröződés egy tükörben
1885 | rich (adjective): having a lot of money and material wealth | loc: gazdag
  EN TS: The rich man is on top.
  hu TS: A gazdag ember van legfelül.
  EN FS: The rich man is at the bottom.
  hu FS: A gazdag ember van legalul.
  EN TP: a rich man on top
  hu TP: gazdag ember a csúcson
  EN FP: a rich man in prison
  hu FP: gazdag ember börtönben
1886 | consumer (noun): a person who buys and uses goods | loc: fogyasztó
  EN TS: The consumer's plate is empty.
  hu TS: A fogyasztó tányérja üres.
  EN FS: The consumer's plate is full.
  hu FS: A fogyasztó tányérja tele van.
  EN TP: a hungry consumer
  hu TP: éhes fogyasztó
  EN FP: a consumer in a shop
  hu FP: fogyasztó egy boltban
1887 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: tolni
  EN TS: He is pushing a heavy cart.
  hu TS: Egy nehéz taligát tol.
  EN FS: He is pushing a heavy car.
  hu FS: Egy nehéz autót tol.
  EN TP: pushing an overloaded cart
  hu TP: túlpakolt taligát tolni
  EN FP: pushing a baby buggy
  hu FP: babakocsit tolni
1889 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: mozogni
  EN TS: She is moving like lightning!
  hu TS: Villámgyorsan mozog!
  EN FS: She is sitting like a statue!
  hu FS: Szoborként ül!
  EN TP: moving to the music
  hu TP: a zenére mozogni
  EN FP: moving to a new flat
  hu FP: új lakásba költözni
1892 | old (adjective): having lived for a long time | loc: öreg
  EN TS: The old man has a thin stick.
  hu TS: Az öreg férfinak vékony botja van.
  EN FS: The old man has an umbrella.
  hu FS: Az öreg férfinak esernyője van.
  EN TP: the old man's stick
  hu TP: az öreg férfi botja
  EN FP: the old man's umbrella
  hu FP: az öreg férfi esernyője
1894 | hedgehog (noun): a small animal covered in sharp spines | loc: sün
  EN TS: Sleep well, little hedgehogs.
  hu TS: Jó éjszakát, kis sünök!
  EN FS: Sleep well, little rabbits.
  hu FS: Jó éjszakát, kis nyuszik!
  EN TP: a hedgehog family in bed
  hu TP: sündisznócsalád az ágyban
  EN FP: a hedgehog in a garden
  hu FP: sün a kertben
1897 | pumpkin (noun): a big round orange vegetable with thick skin | loc: tök
  EN TS: The crow owns these pumpkins.
  hu TS: Ezek a tökök a varjúéi.
  EN FS: The cat owns these pumpkins.
  hu FS: Ezek a tökök a macskáéi.
  EN TP: three stacked pumpkins
  hu TP: három egymásra rakott tök
  EN FP: a pumpkin pie
  hu FP: tökös pite
1899 | ruins (noun): the broken remains of old buildings | loc: romok
  EN TS: Two giants sit near the ruins.
  hu TS: Két óriás ül a romok mellett.
  EN FS: Two lions sit near the ruins.
  hu FS: Két oroszlán ül a romok mellett.
  EN TP: ruins of old temples
  hu TP: régi templomok romjai
  EN FP: ruins of a castle
  hu FP: egy vár romjai
1905 | curious (adjective): wanting to know what is going on | loc: kíváncsi
  EN TS: These cats are so curious!
  hu TS: Ezek a macskák nagyon kíváncsiak!
  EN FS: These dogs are so curious!
  hu FS: Ezek a kutyák nagyon kíváncsiak!
  EN TP: three curious cats
  hu TP: három kíváncsi macska
  EN FP: three sleepy cats
  hu FP: három álmos macska
1906 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: kék
  EN TS: Her hair is blue.
  hu TS: A haja kék.
  EN FS: Her hair is red.
  hu FS: A haja vörös.
  EN TP: long blue hair
  hu TP: hosszú kék haj
  EN FP: a blue summer dress
  hu FP: kék nyári ruha
1908 | heron (noun): a tall water bird with long legs and beak | loc: gém
  EN TS: Bro, the heron is chilling.
  hu TS: Tesó, a gém chillel.
  EN FS: Bro, the swan is chilling.
  hu FS: Tesó, a hattyú chillel.
  EN TP: a heron on a branch
  hu TP: gém egy ágon
  EN FP: a heron in the water
  hu FP: gém a vízben
1909 | blade (noun): the flat cutting part of a knife | loc: penge
  EN TS: Her blade is shining.
  hu TS: Ragyog a pengéje.
  EN FS: Her blade is rusty.
  hu FS: Rozsdás a pengéje.
  EN TP: a long steel blade
  hu TP: hosszú acélpenge
  EN FP: a short broken blade
  hu FP: rövid, törött penge
1910 | petal (noun): one of the soft colored parts of a flower | loc: szirom
  EN TS: She has so many pink petals.
  hu TS: Annyi rózsaszín szirma van.
  EN FS: She has so many pink feathers.
  hu FS: Annyi rózsaszín tolla van.
  EN TP: large pink petals
  hu TP: nagy rózsaszín szirmok
  EN FP: petals on the floor
  hu FP: szirmok a padlón
1911 | princess (noun): the daughter of a king or queen | loc: hercegnő
  EN TS: This princess has great style.
  hu TS: Ennek a hercegnőnek nagyon jó stílusa van.
  EN FS: This prince has great style.
  hu FS: Ennek a hercegnek nagyon jó stílusa van.
  EN TP: a princess in blue
  hu TP: kék ruhás hercegnő
  EN FP: a princess in red
  hu FP: piros ruhás hercegnő
1912 | tattoo (noun): a permanent picture inked into the skin | loc: tetoválás
  EN TS: Her tattoos are blue.
  hu TS: A tetoválásai kékek.
  EN FS: Her tattoos are red.
  hu FS: A tetoválásai pirosak.
  EN TP: swirling blue face tattoos
  hu TP: kavargó kék arctetoválások
  EN FP: a tattoo on her hand
  hu FP: tetoválás a kezén
1914 | piano (noun): a large instrument you play by pressing keys | loc: zongora
  EN TS: The piano is open. Hungry?
  hu TS: A zongora nyitva van. Éhes?
  EN FS: The door is open. Hungry?
  hu FS: Az ajtó nyitva van. Éhes?
  EN TP: an open grand piano
  hu TP: nyitott hangversenyzongora
  EN FP: a piano lesson
  hu FP: zongoraóra
1915 | bass (noun): the biggest string instrument, deepest sound | loc: nagybőgő
  EN TS: The bass has four strings.
  hu TS: A nagybőgőnek négy húrja van.
  EN FS: The bass has six strings.
  hu FS: A nagybőgőnek hat húrja van.
  EN TP: a bass with four strings
  hu TP: négyhúros nagybőgő
  EN FP: a bass with six strings
  hu FP: hathúros nagybőgő
1916 | ufo (noun): a flying object believed to come from space | loc: UFO
  EN TS: There are UFOs in the sky.
  hu TS: UFO-k vannak az égen.
  EN FS: There are birds in the sky.
  hu FS: Madarak vannak az égen.
  EN TP: UFOs in the sky
  hu TP: UFO-k az égen
  EN FP: a UFO landing
  hu FP: leszálló UFO
1917 | speed (noun): how fast something moves, distance per time | loc: sebesség
  EN TS: A helmet designed for speed.
  hu TS: Sebességre tervezett sisak.
  EN FS: A helmet designed for cycling.
  hu FS: Kerékpározásra tervezett sisak.
  EN TP: a helmet built for speed
  hu TP: sebességre épített sisak
  EN FP: speed on a bicycle
  hu FP: sebesség biciklin
1919 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: keskeny
  EN TS: The lane is very narrow.
  hu TS: A sikátor nagyon keskeny.
  EN FS: The lane is very wide.
  hu FS: A sikátor nagyon széles.
  EN TP: a narrow cobblestone lane
  hu TP: keskeny macskaköves sikátor
  EN FP: a narrow escape
  hu FP: hajszál híján megúszni
1920 | cyborg (noun): a being that is part human, part machine | loc: kiborg
  EN TS: The cyborg has a glowing head.
  hu TS: A kiborgnak világít a feje.
  EN FS: The cyborg has a glowing tail.
  hu FS: A kiborgnak világít a farka.
  EN TP: a neon city cyborg
  hu TP: neonvárosi kiborg
  EN FP: a cyborg in a forest
  hu FP: kiborg az erdőben
1921 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: döbbent
  EN TS: A shocked face by the water.
  hu TS: Egy döbbent arc a víz mellett.
  EN FS: A shocked face in the forest.
  hu FS: Egy döbbent arc az erdőben.
  EN TP: a shocked, screaming face
  hu TP: döbbent, sikoltó arc
  EN FP: shocked by the phone bill
  hu FP: a telefonszámlától döbbent
1922 | study (verb): to learn about a subject by reading | loc: tanulni
  EN TS: Studying gives her a headache.
  hu TS: Ha tanul, megfájdul a feje.
  EN FS: Cooking gives her a headache.
  hu FS: Ha főz, megfájdul a feje.
  EN TP: studying a huge book
  hu TP: hatalmas könyvből tanulni
  EN FP: studying in the garden
  hu FP: a kertben tanulni
1923 | bookshelf (noun): shelves where books stand side by side | loc: könyvespolc
  EN TS: The bookshelves are packed!
  hu TS: A könyvespolcok roskadásig tele vannak!
  EN FS: The bookshelves are empty!
  hu FS: A könyvespolcok teljesen üresek!
  EN TP: tall bookshelves full of books
  hu TP: magas, könyvekkel teli könyvespolcok
  EN FP: an empty bookshelf
  hu FP: üres könyvespolc
1924 | vivid (adjective): very bright and intense in colour | loc: élénk
  EN TS: So many vivid colours!
  hu TS: Mennyi élénk szín!
  EN FS: So many dull colours!
  hu FS: Mennyi fakó szín!
  EN TP: vivid swirls of colour
  hu TP: élénk színörvények
  EN FP: a vivid dream
  hu FP: élénk álom
1926 | teeth (noun): the hard white things in your mouth for biting | loc: fogak
  EN TS: The skull has all its teeth!
  hu TS: A koponyának megvan az összes foga!
  EN FS: The skull has no teeth!
  hu FS: A koponyának egy foga sincs!
  EN TP: a skull's grinning teeth
  hu TP: egy koponya vigyorgó fogai
  EN FP: a dog's sharp teeth
  hu FP: egy kutya éles fogai
1927 | roots (noun): the parts of a plant that grow underground | loc: gyökerek
  EN TS: Golden roots? Not a cheap tree.
  hu TS: Arany gyökerek? Nem egy olcsó fa.
  EN FS: Golden leaves? Not a cheap tree.
  hu FS: Arany levelek? Nem egy olcsó fa.
  EN TP: golden roots with jewels
  hu TP: arany gyökerek ékkövekkel
  EN FP: golden leaves with jewels
  hu FP: arany levelek ékkövekkel
1928 | downtown (noun): the busy central business area of a city | loc: belváros
  EN TS: Downtown glows red. So cool.
  hu TS: A belváros pirosan izzik. Nagyon menő.
  EN FS: Downtown glows green. So cool.
  hu FS: A belváros zölden izzik. Nagyon menő.
  EN TP: a neon downtown street
  hu TP: neonfényes belvárosi utca
  EN FP: a quiet downtown morning
  hu FP: csendes belvárosi reggel
1930 | medieval (adjective): from the age of castles and stone towns | loc: középkori
  EN TS: The medieval town looks cosy.
  hu TS: A középkori város hangulatos.
  EN FS: The modern city looks cosy.
  hu FS: A modern város hangulatos.
  EN TP: a medieval stone town
  hu TP: középkori kőváros
  EN FP: a medieval market day
  hu FP: középkori vásárnap
1931 | rainy (adjective): with a lot of water falling from the clouds | loc: esős
  EN TS: A rainy city street.
  hu TS: Esős városi utca.
  EN FS: A sunny city street.
  hu FS: Napos városi utca.
  EN TP: a rainy street
  hu TP: esős utca
  EN FP: a rainy beach
  hu FP: esős tengerpart
1932 | computer (noun): an electronic machine for work, games and the web | loc: számítógép
  EN TS: The computer is on a red desk.
  hu TS: A számítógép egy piros asztalon van.
  EN FS: The computer is on a red sofa.
  hu FS: A számítógép egy piros kanapén van.
  EN TP: a computer on a desk
  hu TP: számítógép egy asztalon
  EN FP: a computer on a lap
  hu FP: számítógép az ölben
1933 | spirit (noun): a magical being of nature, not fully human | loc: szellem
  EN TS: She is a tree spirit.
  hu TS: Ő egy fa szelleme.
  EN FS: She is a water spirit.
  hu FS: Ő egy tó szelleme.
  EN TP: an old tree spirit
  hu TP: egy öreg fa szelleme
  EN FP: a spirit of the ocean
  hu FP: az óceán szelleme
1934 | surreal (adjective): strange and dream-like, against real rules | loc: szürreális
  EN TS: These shelves are surreal.
  hu TS: Ezek a polcok szürreálisak.
  EN FS: These shelves are ordinary.
  hu FS: Ezek a polcok hétköznapiak.
  EN TP: surreal bending bookshelves
  hu TP: szürreális, hajló könyvespolcok
  EN FP: a surreal melting clock
  hu FP: szürreális olvadó óra
1935 | new york (noun): the biggest city in the United States | loc: New York
  EN TS: It is sunset in New York.
  hu TS: Naplemente van New Yorkban.
  EN FS: It is night in New York.
  hu FS: Éjszaka van New Yorkban.
  EN TP: New York at sunset
  hu TP: New York naplementekor
  EN FP: New York at night
  hu FP: New York éjjel
1936 | flower crown (noun): a ring of blossoms you wear on your head | loc: virágkoszorú
  EN TS: Her flower crown is huge!
  hu TS: Óriási a virágkoszorúja!
  EN FS: Her feather crown is huge!
  hu FS: Óriási a tollkoszorúja!
  EN TP: wearing a flower crown
  hu TP: virágkoszorút viselni
  EN FP: making a flower crown
  hu FP: virágkoszorút fonni
1937 | hacker (noun): a person who breaks into computers and code | loc: hacker
  EN TS: The hacker is wearing a hood.
  hu TS: A hacker kapucnit visel.
  EN FS: The hacker is wearing a cap.
  hu FS: A hacker baseballsapkát visel.
  EN TP: a hooded hacker
  hu TP: kapucnis hacker
  EN FP: a hacker in the park
  hu FP: hacker a parkban
1938 | coast (noun): the land right along the edge of the sea | loc: tengerpart
  EN TS: A lone whale off the coast.
  hu TS: Egy magányos bálna a tengerpart közelében.
  EN FS: A lone shark off the coast.
  hu FS: Egy magányos cápa a tengerpart közelében.
  EN TP: a sandy coast from above
  hu TP: homokos tengerpart felülről
  EN FP: a rocky coast with cliffs
  hu FP: sziklás tengerpart szirtekkel
1940 | dandelion (noun): a wild yellow flower that turns into a puffball | loc: pitypang
  EN TS: Dandelions surround her head.
  hu TS: Pitypangok veszik körül a fejét.
  EN FS: Roses surround her head.
  hu FS: Rózsák veszik körül a fejét.
  EN TP: white dandelion puffs
  hu TP: fehér pitypangbóbiták
  EN FP: blowing a dandelion
  hu FP: pitypangot fújni
1941 | pirate (noun): a sea robber who attacks ships | loc: kalóz
  EN TS: This pirate mouse looks like Jack Sparrow.
  hu TS: Ez az egér kalóz, full Jack Sparrow.
  EN FS: This pirate cat looks like Jack Sparrow.
  hu FS: Ez a macska kalóz, full Jack Sparrow.
  EN TP: a pirate mouse
  hu TP: kalózegér
  EN FP: a pirate ship
  hu FP: kalózhajó
1943 | gnome (noun): a tiny fairy-tale creature in a pointed hat | loc: gnóm
  EN TS: The gnome's hat is green. Wow.
  hu TS: A gnóm sapkája zöld. Hűha.
  EN FS: The gnome's hat is red. Wow.
  hu FS: A gnóm sapkája piros. Hűha.
  EN TP: a gnome in green
  hu TP: zöld ruhás gnóm
  EN FP: a gnome in red
  hu FP: piros ruhás gnóm
1944 | ribs (noun): the curved bones around your chest | loc: bordák
  EN TS: Fact: you can see its ribs.
  hu TS: Tény: látszanak a bordái.
  EN FS: Fact: you can see its heart.
  hu FS: Tény: látszik a szíve.
  EN TP: a cage of ribs
  hu TP: bordákból álló kas
  EN FP: ribs on a grill
  hu FP: oldalas a grillen
1945 | spooky (adjective): strange and frightening, like a ghost place | loc: kísérteties
  EN TS: What a spooky castle!
  hu TS: Micsoda kísérteties vár!
  EN FS: What a spooky church!
  hu FS: Micsoda kísérteties templom!
  EN TP: a spooky castle on rocks
  hu TP: kísérteties vár a sziklákon
  EN FP: a spooky castle in snow
  hu FP: kísérteties vár a hóban
1946 | cool (adjective): stylish and relaxed in a way people admire | loc: menő
  EN TS: This cat is too cool.
  hu TS: Ez a macska túl menő.
  EN FS: This dog is too cool.
  hu FS: Ez a kutya túl menő.
  EN TP: a cool cat in sunglasses
  hu TP: menő macska napszemüvegben
  EN FP: a cool summer drink
  hu FP: hűsítő nyári ital
1947 | mane (noun): the long thick hair round a lion's neck | loc: sörény
  EN TS: Just a normal rainbow mane.
  hu TS: Csak egy teljesen átlagos szivárványsörény.
  EN FS: Just a normal black mane.
  hu FS: Csak egy teljesen átlagos fekete sörény.
  EN TP: a rainbow mane
  hu TP: szivárványos sörény
  EN FP: a rainbow over a lion
  hu FP: szivárvány egy oroszlán fölött
1948 | wavy (adjective): forming soft curves instead of lying straight | loc: hullámos
  EN TS: Her wavy hair is everywhere!
  hu TS: A hullámos haja mindenhol ott van!
  EN FS: Her short hair is everywhere!
  hu FS: A rövid haja mindenhol ott van!
  EN TP: wavy hair full of leaves
  hu TP: hullámos haj tele levelekkel
  EN FP: wavy hair full of flowers
  hu FP: hullámos haj tele virágokkal
1949 | enchanted (adjective): under a magic spell | loc: elvarázsolt
  EN TS: This forest is so enchanted.
  hu TS: Ez az erdő annyira elvarázsolt.
  EN FS: This forest is so burnt.
  hu FS: Ez az erdő annyira leégett.
  EN TP: an enchanted forest path
  hu TP: elvarázsolt erdei ösvény
  EN FP: an enchanted castle
  hu FP: elvarázsolt kastély
1950 | evil (adjective): deeply bad and cruel | loc: gonosz
  EN TS: This evil tower needs a lift.
  hu TS: Ennek a gonosz toronynak lift kéne.
  EN FS: This evil church needs a lift.
  hu FS: Ennek a gonosz templomnak lift kéne.
  EN TP: an evil fortress
  hu TP: gonosz erőd
  EN FP: an evil stepmother
  hu FP: gonosz mostoha
1951 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: fotel
  EN TS: An armchair awaits a reader.
  hu TS: Egy fotel olvasóra vár.
  EN FS: A sofa awaits a reader.
  hu FS: Egy kanapé olvasóra vár.
  EN TP: a worn leather armchair
  hu TP: kopott bőrfotel
  EN FP: a new plastic armchair
  hu FP: új műanyag fotel
1952 | full moon (noun): the whole bright round disc seen in the night sky | loc: telihold
  EN TS: A full moon behind one tree.
  hu TS: Telihold egyetlen fa mögött.
  EN FS: A full moon behind two trees.
  hu FS: Telihold két fa mögött.
  EN TP: full moon behind a tree
  hu TP: telihold egy fa mögött
  EN FP: full moon over the sea
  hu FP: telihold a tenger fölött
1953 | snowflake (noun): a single small ice crystal that falls as snow | loc: hópehely
  EN TS: Snowflake crown? Queen vibes.
  hu TS: Hópehely-korona? Királynői vibe.
  EN FS: Flower crown? Queen vibes.
  hu FS: Virágkorona? Királynői vibe.
  EN TP: a crown of snowflakes
  hu TP: hópelyhekből álló korona
  EN FP: snowflakes on a window
  hu FP: hópelyhek az ablakon
1955 | fairy tale (noun): a magical story world with witches and elves | loc: mese
  EN TS: OMG, it's a fairy tale house.
  hu TS: Úristen, ez egy mesebeli ház.
  EN FS: OMG, it's a fairy tale boat.
  hu FS: Úristen, ez egy mesebeli hajó.
  EN TP: a fairy tale cottage
  hu TP: mesebeli házikó
  EN FP: a fairy tale castle
  hu FP: mesebeli kastély
1957 | cobblestones (noun): the round stones that pave old streets | loc: macskakövek
  EN TS: The cobblestones are wet.
  hu TS: A macskakövek nedvesek.
  EN FS: The cobblestones are snowy.
  hu FS: A macskakövek havasak.
  EN TP: wet cobblestones at night
  hu TP: nedves macskakövek éjjel
  EN FP: cobblestones on a beach
  hu FP: macskakövek a tengerparton
1958 | stairs (noun): a flight of steps | loc: lépcső
  EN TS: Stone stairs and pink flowers.
  hu TS: Kőlépcső és rózsaszín virágok.
  EN FS: Stone stairs and red flowers.
  hu FS: Kőlépcső és piros virágok.
  EN TP: stone stairs in a village
  hu TP: kőlépcső egy faluban
  EN FP: stone stairs in a castle
  hu FP: kőlépcső egy várban
1959 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: fonat
  EN TS: Her braid reaches her waist.
  hu TS: A fonata a derekáig ér.
  EN FS: Her braid reaches her knees.
  hu FS: A fonata a térdéig ér.
  EN TP: a waist-long braid
  hu TP: derékig érő fonat
  EN FP: a short braid
  hu FP: rövid fonat
1960 | samurai (noun): a Japanese warrior who fights with a sword | loc: szamuráj
  EN TS: She's walking like a real samurai.
  hu TS: Úgy jár, mint egy igazi szamuráj.
  EN FS: She's dancing like a real samurai.
  hu FS: Úgy táncol, mint egy igazi szamuráj.
  EN TP: a samurai with a sword
  hu TP: szamuráj karddal
  EN FP: a samurai with a bow
  hu FP: szamuráj íjjal
1961 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: csont
  EN TS: These bones love a good book.
  hu TS: Ezek a csontok imádnak egy jó könyvet.
  EN FS: These bones love a good film.
  hu FS: Ezek a csontok imádnak egy jó filmet.
  EN TP: bones over an open book
  hu TP: csontok egy nyitott könyv fölött
  EN FP: a dog with a bone
  hu FP: kutya egy csonttal
1962 | fortress (noun): a large strong building made to defend | loc: erőd
  EN TS: This fortress looks scary!
  hu TS: Ez az erőd ijesztő!
  EN FS: This cottage looks scary!
  hu FS: Ez a házikó ijesztő!
  EN TP: a dark hilltop fortress
  hu TP: sötét erőd a dombtetőn
  EN FP: a fortress in the desert
  hu FP: erőd a sivatagban
1964 | haunted (adjective): believed to have ghosts living inside | loc: kísértetjárta
  EN TS: The house must be haunted.
  hu TS: Ez a ház tuti kísértetjárta.
  EN FS: The school must be haunted.
  hu FS: Ez a suli tuti kísértetjárta.
  EN TP: a haunted old house
  hu TP: kísértetjárta régi ház
  EN FP: a haunted old ship
  hu FP: kísértetjárta régi hajó
1965 | cabin (noun): a small simple wooden house | loc: faház
  EN TS: Cosy cabin. A bit of snow.
  hu TS: Hangulatos faház. Egy kis hó.
  EN FS: Cosy cabin. A bit of sand.
  hu FS: Hangulatos faház. Egy kis homok.
  EN TP: a snowy wooden cabin
  hu TP: havas faház
  EN FP: a cabin on a ship
  hu FP: kabin egy hajón
1966 | path (noun): a narrow marked way that you walk along | loc: ösvény
  EN TS: The path is made of stones.
  hu TS: Az ösvény kövekből van.
  EN FS: The path is made of wood.
  hu FS: Az ösvény fából van.
  EN TP: a cobblestone path
  hu TP: macskaköves ösvény
  EN FP: a forest path
  hu FP: erdei ösvény
1967 | cute (adjective): small and sweet in a way that makes you smile | loc: aranyos
  EN TS: The baby fox is so cute!
  hu TS: A rókakölyök nagyon aranyos!
  EN FS: The baby bear is so cute!
  hu FS: A medvebocs nagyon aranyos!
  EN TP: a cute baby fox
  hu TP: aranyos rókakölyök
  EN FP: a cute baby bird
  hu FP: aranyos madárfióka
1968 | raven (noun): a large black bird like a big crow | loc: holló
  EN TS: I think those are ravens.
  hu TS: Szerintem azok hollók.
  EN FS: I think those are parrots.
  hu FS: Szerintem azok papagájok.
  EN TP: ravens flying around her
  hu TP: körülötte repkedő hollók
  EN FP: ravens sitting on her arm
  hu FP: hollók a karján
1969 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: virágcsokor
  EN TS: A bouquet from space? Romantic!
  hu TS: Virágcsokor az űrből? Romantikus!
  EN FS: A bouquet from the sea? Romantic!
  hu FS: Virágcsokor a tengerből? Romantikus!
  EN TP: gathering a bouquet
  hu TP: virágcsokrot szedni
  EN FP: throwing a bouquet
  hu FP: virágcsokrot dobni
1970 | hut (noun): a small simple building | loc: kunyhó
  EN TS: The hut has one plank door. Basic, but solid.
  hu TS: A kunyhónak egy deszkaajtaja van. Alap, de stabil.
  EN FS: The hut has one glass door. Basic, but solid.
  hu FS: A kunyhónak egy üvegajtaja van. Alap, de stabil.
  EN TP: a tiny snowy hut
  hu TP: apró havas kunyhó
  EN FP: a tiny beach hut
  hu FP: apró tengerparti kunyhó
1971 | peak (noun): the pointed top of a mountain | loc: csúcs
  EN TS: Peaks over clouds. Unreal.
  hu TS: Csúcsok a felhők felett. Durva.
  EN FS: Peaks under clouds. Unreal.
  hu FS: Csúcsok a felhők alatt. Durva.
  EN TP: snowy peaks above the clouds
  hu TP: havas csúcsok a felhők felett
  EN FP: peaks covered in forest
  hu FP: erdővel borított csúcsok
1972 | turban (noun): a long cloth wound around the head | loc: turbán
  EN TS: That turban is a whole tower!
  hu TS: Az a turbán egy egész torony!
  EN FS: That crown is a whole tower!
  hu FS: Az a korona egy egész torony!
  EN TP: a tall jeweled turban
  hu TP: magas, ékköves turbán
  EN FP: a turban in the desert
  hu FP: turbán a sivatagban
1973 | goddess (noun): a female god | loc: istennő
  EN TS: This goddess looks Egyptian.
  hu TS: Ez az istennő egyiptominak tűnik.
  EN FS: This goddess looks Japanese.
  hu FS: Ez az istennő japánnak tűnik.
  EN TP: a goddess with golden wings
  hu TP: istennő arany szárnyakkal
  EN FP: a goddess with a bow
  hu FP: istennő íjjal
1974 | ballerina (noun): a girl who dances ballet on her toes | loc: balerina
  EN TS: The ballerina is on her toes.
  hu TS: A balerina a lábujjhegyén áll.
  EN FS: The ballerina is on her knees.
  hu FS: A balerina a térdén áll.
  EN TP: a ballerina in a tutu
  hu TP: balerina tütüben
  EN FP: a ballerina shoe
  hu FP: balerinacipő
1976 | skate (verb): to glide over ice wearing ice skates | loc: korcsolyázni
  EN TS: Four kids are skating while squirrels judge them.
  hu TS: Négy gyerek korcsolyázik, a mókusok meg pontoznak.
  EN FS: Four kids are skating while dogs judge them.
  hu FS: Négy gyerek korcsolyázik, a kutyák meg pontoznak.
  EN TP: skating on a frozen pond
  hu TP: befagyott tavon korcsolyázni
  EN FP: skating on a half-pipe
  hu FP: rámpán korcsolyázni
1977 | creepy (adjective): making you feel nervous and a bit scared | loc: hátborzongató
  EN TS: The bats make it extra creepy!
  hu TS: A denevérektől még hátborzongatóbb!
  EN FS: The owls make it extra creepy!
  hu FS: A baglyoktól még hátborzongatóbb!
  EN TP: a creepy ruined house
  hu TP: hátborzongató romos ház
  EN FP: a creepy old doll
  hu FP: hátborzongató régi baba
1979 | dye (verb): to change the colour of hair or cloth | loc: festeni
  EN TS: She dyed it purple. Bold!
  hu TS: Lilára festette. Merész!
  EN FS: She dyed it green. Bold!
  hu FS: Zöldre festette. Merész!
  EN TP: hair dyed bright purple
  hu TP: élénklilára festett haj
  EN FP: hair dyed bright green
  hu FP: élénkzöldre festett haj
1980 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: fenyő
  EN TS: Evergreen pines surround the hut.
  hu TS: Örökzöld fenyők veszik körül a kunyhót.
  EN FS: Evergreen palms surround the hut.
  hu FS: Örökzöld pálmák veszik körül a kunyhót.
  EN TP: snowy pine trees
  hu TP: havas fenyők
  EN FP: a pine table
  hu FP: fenyőasztal
1981 | crash (verb): to hit something hard with a loud noise | loc: csapódik
  EN TS: Waves are crashing into the lighthouse!
  hu TS: A hullámok a világítótoronynak csapódnak!
  EN FS: Waves are crashing into the harbour!
  hu FS: A hullámok a kikötőnek csapódnak!
  EN TP: waves crashing on rocks
  hu TP: sziklákra csapódó hullámok
  EN FP: crashing on a friend's sofa
  hu FP: egy haver kanapéján aludni
1982 | cluttered (adjective): untidily full of far too many things | loc: zsúfolt
  EN TS: The room is "a bit" cluttered.
  hu TS: A szoba „kicsit” zsúfolt.
  EN FS: The room is "a bit" empty.
  hu FS: A szoba „kicsit” üres.
  EN TP: cluttered shelves
  hu TP: zsúfolt polcok
  EN FP: a cluttered desk
  hu FP: zsúfolt íróasztal
1983 | eyelashes (noun): the small hairs on the edge of the eyelids | loc: szempillák
  EN TS: Her eyelashes are very long.
  hu TS: Nagyon hosszúak a szempillái.
  EN FS: Her eyelashes are very short.
  hu FS: Nagyon rövidek a szempillái.
  EN TP: long dark eyelashes
  hu TP: hosszú sötét szempillák
  EN FP: fake eyelashes in a box
  hu FP: műszempilla egy dobozban
1984 | pale (adjective): very light, almost white in colour | loc: sápadt
  EN TS: Her face is very pale.
  hu TS: Nagyon sápadt az arca.
  EN FS: Her face is very dark.
  hu FS: Nagyon sötét az arca.
  EN TP: a pale white face
  hu TP: sápadt fehér arc
  EN FP: a pale blue sky
  hu FP: halványkék ég
1985 | bright (adjective): strong and full of color, easy to see | loc: élénk
  EN TS: The tree is bright red!
  hu TS: A fa élénkpiros!
  EN FS: The tree is bright green!
  hu FS: A fa élénkzöld!
  EN TP: bright red leaves
  hu TP: élénkpiros levelek
  EN FP: bright red apples
  hu FP: élénkpiros almák
1986 | bare (adjective): not covered — no leaves, no clothes | loc: csupasz
  EN TS: The tree is bare. So sad.
  hu TS: A fa csupasz. Olyan szomorú.
  EN FS: The tree is green. So sad.
  hu FS: A fa zöld. Olyan szomorú.
  EN TP: a bare tree at night
  hu TP: csupasz fa éjjel
  EN FP: bare feet in the grass
  hu FP: mezítláb a fűben
1987 | future (phrase): the time that will come after now | loc: jövő
  EN TS: This city is from the future.
  hu TS: Ez a város a jövőből jött.
  EN FS: This city is from the past.
  hu FS: Ez a város a múltból jött.
  EN TP: a city of the future
  hu TP: a jövő városa
  EN FP: a city of the past
  hu FP: a múlt városa
1988 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: kerítés
  EN TS: The fence has sharp spikes.
  hu TS: A kerítésnek éles tüskéi vannak.
  EN FS: The fence has no gate.
  hu FS: A kerítésnek nincs kapuja.
  EN TP: a spiked iron fence
  hu TP: tüskés vaskerítés
  EN FP: a wooden garden fence
  hu FP: kerti fakerítés
1989 | potion (noun): a magic drink made for a special effect | loc: bájital
  EN TS: Old potions fill the shelves.
  hu TS: Régi bájitalok töltik meg a polcokat.
  EN FS: Old shoes fill the shelves.
  hu FS: Régi cipők töltik meg a polcokat.
  EN TP: shelves of old potions
  hu TP: régi bájitalok a polcokon
  EN FP: a potion in a cauldron
  hu FP: bájital egy üstben
1990 | comfortable (adjective): giving a feeling of physical well-being | loc: kényelmes
  EN TS: A super comfortable armchair.
  hu TS: Egy szuper kényelmes fotel.
  EN FS: A super comfortable sofa.
  hu FS: Egy szuper kényelmes kanapé.
  EN TP: a comfortable golden armchair
  hu TP: kényelmes arany fotel
  EN FP: a comfortable golden bed
  hu FP: kényelmes arany ágy
1991 | type (verb): to write using a keyboard | loc: gépelni
  EN TS: He is typing like a machine!
  hu TS: Úgy gépel, mint egy gép!
  EN FS: He is painting like a machine!
  hu FS: Úgy fest, mint egy gép!
  EN TP: typing on a keyboard
  hu TP: billentyűzeten gépelni
  EN FP: typing on a phone
  hu FP: telefonon gépelni
1992 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: hallgatni
  EN TS: She is listening through big green headphones.
  hu TS: Nagy zöld fejhallgatóban hallgat zenét.
  EN FS: She is listening through big red headphones.
  hu FS: Nagy piros fejhallgatóban hallgat zenét.
  EN TP: listening to music
  hu TP: zenét hallgatni
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  hu FP: egy tanárt hallgatni
1994 | on top of (preposition): resting on the highest part of something | loc: tetején
  EN TS: A cat is on top of the books.
  hu TS: Egy macska ül a könyvek tetején.
  EN FS: A cat is on top of the hedge.
  hu FS: Egy macska ül a sövény tetején.
  EN TP: on top of the books
  hu TP: a könyvek tetején
  EN FP: on top of the car
  hu FP: az autó tetején
1995 | doorway (noun): the opening in a wall where a door is | loc: ajtónyílás
  EN TS: This doorway leads to another world.
  hu TS: Ez az ajtónyílás egy másik világba vezet.
  EN FS: This doorway leads to a dark cellar.
  hu FS: Ez az ajtónyílás egy sötét pincébe vezet.
  EN TP: a glowing arched doorway
  hu TP: világító íves ajtónyílás
  EN FP: a doorway to the kitchen
  hu FP: ajtónyílás a konyhába
1997 | axe (noun): a tool with a heavy blade for chopping | loc: fejsze
  EN TS: That battle axe is huge!
  hu TS: Az a harci fejsze óriási!
  EN FS: That battle shield is huge!
  hu FS: Az a harci pajzs óriási!
  EN TP: holding a battle axe
  hu TP: harci fejszét tartva
  EN FP: holding a battle flag
  hu FP: harci zászlót tartva
1998 | mansion (noun): a very large and impressive house | loc: kastély
  EN TS: Rich people live in this mansion.
  hu TS: Ebben a kastélyban gazdagok laknak.
  EN FS: Rich people live in this cottage.
  hu FS: Ebben a házikóban gazdagok laknak.
  EN TP: a mansion at dusk
  hu TP: kastély alkonyatkor
  EN FP: a mansion on the beach
  hu FP: kastély a tengerparton
1999 | fur (noun): the soft thick hair covering an animal | loc: bunda
  EN TS: Bro, that fur is so thick.
  hu TS: Tesó, ez a bunda nagyon vastag.
  EN FS: Bro, that fur is so black.
  hu FS: Tesó, ez a bunda nagyon fekete.
  EN TP: thick white fur
  hu TP: vastag fehér bunda
  EN FP: a white fur coat
  hu FP: fehér szőrmekabát
2000 | moonlight (noun): the light the moon gives at night | loc: holdfény
  EN TS: Moonlight is shining on water.
  hu TS: Holdfény ragyog a vízen.
  EN FS: Sunlight is shining on water.
  hu FS: Napfény ragyog a vízen.
  EN TP: moonlight on a marsh
  hu TP: holdfény egy mocsáron
  EN FP: moonlight in a bedroom
  hu FP: holdfény egy hálószobában
2001 | beak (noun): the hard pointed mouth part of a bird | loc: csőr
  EN TS: The owl has a gold beak. Rich owl!
  hu TS: A baglynak arany csőre van. Gazdag bagoly!
  EN FS: The owl has a red beak. Rich owl!
  hu FS: A baglynak piros csőre van. Gazdag bagoly!
  EN TP: an owl's golden beak
  hu TP: bagoly arany csőre
  EN FP: an owl's broken beak
  hu FP: bagoly törött csőre
2002 | whiskers (noun): the long stiff hairs on a cat's face | loc: bajusz
  EN TS: The cat has long whiskers.
  hu TS: A macskának hosszú a bajusza.
  EN FS: The cat has short whiskers.
  hu FS: A macskának rövid a bajusza.
  EN TP: a cat with long whiskers
  hu TP: hosszú bajuszú macska
  EN FP: a man with long whiskers
  hu FP: hosszú bajuszú férfi
2005 | crow (noun): a big all-black bird with a harsh call | loc: varjú
  EN TS: The crow is waiting for news.
  hu TS: A varjú hírekre vár.
  EN FS: The owl is waiting for news.
  hu FS: A bagoly hírekre vár.
  EN TP: a crow on a branch
  hu TP: varjú egy ágon
  EN FP: a crow on a scarecrow
  hu FP: varjú egy madárijesztőn
2008 | trunk (noun): the thick wooden stem of a tree | loc: törzs
  EN TS: The trunk is huge and twisted.
  hu TS: A törzs hatalmas és csavarodott.
  EN FS: The trunk is thin and smooth.
  hu FS: A törzs vékony és sima.
  EN TP: a massive twisted trunk
  hu TP: hatalmas, csavarodott fatörzs
  EN FP: an elephant's trunk
  hu FP: elefántormány
2010 | story (noun): a tale about people and events | loc: történet
  EN TS: The story is coming alive!
  hu TS: A történet életre kel!
  EN FS: The story is burning!
  hu FS: A történet lángokban áll!
  EN TP: a story coming alive
  hu TP: életre kelő történet
  EN FP: a story about a city
  hu FP: történet egy városról
2011 | open (adjective): not closed, so you can go or see through | loc: nyitott
  EN TS: The door is wide open.
  hu TS: Teljesen nyitott az ajtó.
  EN FS: The door is closed.
  hu FS: Teljesen zárt az ajtó.
  EN TP: an open glass door
  hu TP: nyitott üvegajtó
  EN FP: an open laptop
  hu FP: nyitott laptop
2012 | entrance (noun): something that gives you a way to get in | loc: bejárat
  EN TS: Flowers cover the entrance.
  hu TS: Virágok borítják a bejáratot.
  EN FS: Snow covers the entrance.
  hu FS: Hó borítja a bejáratot.
  EN TP: a garden entrance with flowers
  hu TP: virágos kerti bejárat
  EN FP: a hotel entrance with flowers
  hu FP: virágos szállodai bejárat
2013 | gothic (adjective): in a dark dramatic style with black clothes | loc: gótikus
  EN TS: Her makeup? Totally gothic.
  hu TS: A sminkje? Totál gótikus.
  EN FS: Her makeup? Totally pink.
  hu FS: A sminkje? Totál rózsaszín.
  EN TP: a gothic look
  hu TP: gótikus stílus
  EN FP: a gothic church
  hu FP: gótikus templom
2014 | dusk (noun): the fading light just before night | loc: szürkület
  EN TS: Alone at dusk. So mysterious.
  hu TS: Egyedül a szürkületben. Olyan titokzatos.
  EN FS: Alone at noon. So mysterious.
  hu FS: Egyedül délben. Olyan titokzatos.
  EN TP: an old lane at dusk
  hu TP: régi sikátor szürkületkor
  EN FP: dusk on an empty beach
  hu FP: szürkület egy üres tengerparton
2015 | monument (noun): a big old structure built to be remembered | loc: emlékmű
  EN TS: Fact: the monument is stone.
  hu TS: Tény: az emlékmű kőből van.
  EN FS: Fact: the monument is wood.
  hu FS: Tény: az emlékmű fából van.
  EN TP: an old stone monument
  hu TP: régi kő emlékmű
  EN FP: a monument in a square
  hu FP: emlékmű egy téren
2016 | wand (noun): a thin stick used to cast magic spells | loc: varázspálca
  EN TS: Harry Potter needs this wand, bro.
  hu TS: Harry Potternek kell ez a varázspálca, tesó.
  EN FS: Harry Potter needs this broom, bro.
  hu FS: Harry Potternek kell ez a seprű, tesó.
  EN TP: a glowing magic wand
  hu TP: világító varázspálca
  EN FP: a broken magic wand
  hu FP: törött varázspálca
2019 | locomotive (noun): the engine at the front that pulls a train | loc: mozdony
  EN TS: The locomotive runs on steam.
  hu TS: A mozdony gőzzel megy.
  EN FS: The locomotive runs on diesel.
  hu FS: A mozdony dízellel megy.
  EN TP: an old steam locomotive
  hu TP: régi gőzmozdony
  EN FP: an old diesel locomotive
  hu FP: régi dízelmozdony
2021 | constellation (noun): a group of stars that forms a pattern | loc: csillagkép
  EN TS: Constellations fill the sky.
  hu TS: Csillagképek töltik be az eget.
  EN FS: Rainbows fill the sky.
  hu FS: Szivárványok töltik be az eget.
  EN TP: constellations above the house
  hu TP: csillagképek a ház fölött
  EN FP: constellations on a map
  hu FP: csillagképek egy térképen
2023 | gift (noun): something you are given for free | loc: ajándék
  EN TS: Gifts were left in the snow!
  hu TS: Ajándékokat hagytak a hóban!
  EN FS: Skis were left in the snow!
  hu FS: Síléceket hagytak a hóban!
  EN TP: gift boxes in the snow
  hu TP: ajándékdobozok a hóban
  EN FP: gift boxes under a bed
  hu FP: ajándékdobozok az ágy alatt
2024 | neon (adjective): glowing in bright electric colours | loc: neon
  EN TS: Neon signs everywhere!
  hu TS: Mindenhol neonfeliratok!
  EN FS: Paper signs everywhere!
  hu FS: Mindenhol papírfeliratok!
  EN TP: pink and green neon signs
  hu TP: rózsaszín és zöld neonfeliratok
  EN FP: a neon green jacket
  hu FP: neonzöld dzseki
2025 | futuristic (adjective): looking modern, high-tech and from the future | loc: futurisztikus
  EN TS: Futuristic city, year 3000?
  hu TS: Futurisztikus város, 3000-es év?
  EN FS: Futuristic village, year 3000?
  hu FS: Futurisztikus falu, 3000-es év?
  EN TP: futuristic towers at night
  hu TP: futurisztikus tornyok éjjel
  EN FP: a futuristic flying car
  hu FP: futurisztikus repülő autó
2026 | study (noun): a room at home used for reading and working | loc: dolgozószoba
  EN TS: What a dreamy study!
  hu TS: Micsoda álomszép dolgozószoba!
  EN FS: What a dreamy kitchen!
  hu FS: Micsoda álomszép konyha!
  EN TP: a study full of flowers
  hu TP: virágokkal teli dolgozószoba
  EN FP: a study full of students
  hu FP: diákokkal teli dolgozószoba
2028 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: kancsó
  EN TS: A white jug sits among books.
  hu TS: Egy fehér kancsó van a könyvek között.
  EN FS: A white cat sits among books.
  hu FS: Egy fehér macska van a könyvek között.
  EN TP: a jug on a bookshelf
  hu TP: kancsó egy könyvespolcon
  EN FP: a jug on a table
  hu FP: kancsó egy asztalon
2029 | trail (noun): a rough path through the countryside | loc: ösvény
  EN TS: The trail vanishes in the fog.
  hu TS: Az ösvény eltűnik a ködben.
  EN FS: The trail vanishes in the sea.
  hu FS: Az ösvény eltűnik a tengerben.
  EN TP: a stony mountain trail
  hu TP: köves hegyi ösvény
  EN FP: a trail of footprints
  hu FP: lábnyomok sora
2031 | twig (noun): a very small thin branch of a tree | loc: gally
  EN TS: Her hair has twigs. Weird.
  hu TS: Gallyak vannak a hajában. Fura.
  EN FS: Her hair has flowers. Weird.
  hu FS: Virágok vannak a hajában. Fura.
  EN TP: twigs in her hair
  hu TP: gallyak a hajában
  EN FP: a nest of twigs
  hu FP: gallyakból rakott fészek
2032 | portal (noun): a gateway that leads into another world | loc: portál
  EN TS: A portal to a golden city.
  hu TS: Portál egy arany városba.
  EN FS: A portal to a dark forest.
  hu FS: Portál egy sötét erdőbe.
  EN TP: a glowing round portal
  hu TP: világító kerek portál
  EN FP: a portal under the sea
  hu FP: portál a tenger alatt
2033 | whirlpool (noun): water that spins round and pulls things down | loc: örvény
  EN TS: The guitar is in a whirlpool!
  hu TS: A gitár egy örvényben van!
  EN FS: The guitar is in a desert!
  hu FS: A gitár egy sivatagban van!
  EN TP: a guitar in a whirlpool
  hu TP: gitár egy örvényben
  EN FP: a boat in a whirlpool
  hu FP: csónak egy örvényben
2034 | poppy (noun): a wild flower with thin red petals | loc: pipacs
  EN TS: This poppy is red. Very red.
  hu TS: Ez a pipacs piros. Nagyon piros.
  EN FS: This poppy is blue. Very blue.
  hu FS: Ez a pipacs kék. Nagyon kék.
  EN TP: a red poppy bloom
  hu TP: piros pipacsvirág
  EN FP: a field of poppies
  hu FP: pipacsmező
2035 | romance (noun): a loving relationship between two people | loc: románc
  EN TS: This romance has a pink heart.
  hu TS: Ennek a románcnak rózsaszín szíve van.
  EN FS: This romance has a red heart.
  hu FS: Ennek a románcnak piros szíve van.
  EN TP: a romance in spring
  hu TP: tavaszi románc
  EN FP: a romance novel
  hu FP: romantikus regény
2036 | spear (noun): a long pole weapon with a sharp tip | loc: lándzsa
  EN TS: Spear supply is clearly not a problem.
  hu TS: Lándzsából láthatóan nincs hiány.
  EN FS: Sword supply is clearly not a problem.
  hu FS: Kardból láthatóan nincs hiány.
  EN TP: an army raising spears
  hu TP: lándzsákat emelő sereg
  EN FP: an army throwing spears
  hu FP: lándzsákat hajító sereg
2037 | creature (noun): a living being, especially a strange one | loc: lény
  EN TS: A creature with dark wings.
  hu TS: Egy lény sötét szárnyakkal.
  EN FS: A creature with long horns.
  hu FS: Egy lény hosszú szarvakkal.
  EN TP: a dark winged creature
  hu TP: sötét szárnyú lény
  EN FP: a creature in the sea
  hu FP: lény a tengerben
2038 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: ijedt
  EN TS: She is afraid, and the birds know it.
  hu TS: Ijedt, és ezt a madarak is tudják.
  EN FS: She is afraid, and the wolves know it.
  hu FS: Ijedt, és ezt a farkasok is tudják.
  EN TP: afraid in a dark forest
  hu TP: ijedten a sötét erdőben
  EN FP: afraid of a big dog
  hu FP: egy nagy kutyától megijedve
2040 | decoration (noun): a pretty thing that makes a place look festive | loc: dísz
  EN TS: Decorations are on every roof.
  hu TS: Minden tetőn díszek vannak.
  EN FS: Snowmen are on every roof.
  hu FS: Minden tetőn hóemberek vannak.
  EN TP: decorations on the roofs
  hu TP: díszek a tetőkön
  EN FP: decorations in a box
  hu FP: díszek egy dobozban
2041 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: palack
  EN TS: A whole sunset lives in this bottle.
  hu TS: Egy egész naplemente lakik ebben a palackban.
  EN FS: A whole ocean lives in this bottle.
  hu FS: Egy egész óceán lakik ebben a palackban.
  EN TP: a dark glass bottle
  hu TP: sötét üvegpalack
  EN FP: a bottle of red wine
  hu FP: egy palack vörösbor
2042 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: hatalmas
  EN TS: That moon is huge!
  hu TS: Az a hold hatalmas!
  EN FS: That sun is huge!
  hu FS: Az a nap hatalmas!
  EN TP: a huge full moon
  hu TP: hatalmas telihold
  EN FP: a huge old castle
  hu FP: hatalmas régi vár
2045 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: magas
  EN TS: These stones are super tall.
  hu TS: Ezek a kövek szuper magasak.
  EN FS: These trees are super tall.
  hu FS: Ezek a fák szuper magasak.
  EN TP: tall standing stones
  hu TP: magas álló kövek
  EN FP: tall trees in a field
  hu FP: magas fák egy mezőn
2046 | snowy (adjective): covered with snow or full of falling snow | loc: havas
  EN TS: A snowy night in the forest. So quiet...
  hu TS: Havas éjszaka az erdőben. Olyan csend van...
  EN FS: A snowy night in the city. So quiet...
  hu FS: Havas éjszaka a városban. Olyan csend van...
  EN TP: a snowy forest at night
  hu TP: havas erdő éjjel
  EN FP: a snowy street at night
  hu FP: havas utca éjjel
2048 | wild (adjective): living in nature, not kept by people | loc: vad
  EN TS: This wolf is wild!
  hu TS: Ez a farkas vad!
  EN FS: This dog is wild!
  hu FS: Ez a kutya vad!
  EN TP: a wild wolf
  hu TP: vad farkas
  EN FP: a wild party
  hu FP: vad buli
2049 | cozy (adjective): warm, comfortable and inviting | loc: hangulatos
  EN TS: The reading corner looks cozy.
  hu TS: Az olvasósarok hangulatos.
  EN FS: The kitchen corner looks cozy.
  hu FS: A konyhasarok hangulatos.
  EN TP: a cozy reading corner
  hu TP: hangulatos olvasósarok
  EN FP: a cozy wool jumper
  hu FP: kényelmes gyapjúpulcsi
2052 | mug (noun): a big cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: bögre
  EN TS: The mug is on a pile of books.
  hu TS: A bögre egy halom könyvön áll.
  EN FS: The mug is on a pile of boxes.
  hu FS: A bögre egy halom dobozon áll.
  EN TP: a silver mug on books
  hu TP: ezüst bögre könyveken
  EN FP: a mug of cold milk
  hu FP: egy bögre hideg tej
2053 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: polc
  EN TS: Bottles fill every shelf.
  hu TS: Minden polcot palackok töltenek meg.
  EN FS: Books fill every shelf.
  hu FS: Minden polcot könyvek töltenek meg.
  EN TP: shelves of old bottles
  hu TP: polcok régi palackokkal
  EN FP: shelves of old books
  hu FP: polcok régi könyvekkel
2055 | poison (noun): something that harms you if you drink it | loc: méreg
  EN TS: The "Rejuvenation" is poison.
  hu TS: A „Fiatalító” valójában méreg.
  EN FS: The "Rejuvenation" is juice.
  hu FS: A „Fiatalító” valójában gyümölcslé.
  EN TP: a bottle of poison
  hu TP: egy üveg méreg
  EN FP: a bottle of wine
  hu FP: egy üveg bor
2056 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: tele
  EN TS: The shelves are full of books.
  hu TS: A polcok tele vannak könyvekkel.
  EN FS: The shelves are full of jars.
  hu FS: A polcok tele vannak befőttesüvegekkel.
  EN TP: shelves full of old books
  hu TP: polcok tele régi könyvekkel
  EN FP: shelves full of old toys
  hu FP: polcok tele régi játékokkal
2057 | chimney (noun): a pipe on a roof that lets smoke out | loc: kémény
  EN TS: The chimney is made of stone.
  hu TS: A kémény kőből van.
  EN FS: The chimney is made of metal.
  hu FS: A kémény fémből van.
  EN TP: a stone chimney in snow
  hu TP: kőből rakott kémény a hóban
  EN FP: cleaning the chimney
  hu FP: kéményt pucolni
2058 | reach (verb): to move your arm forward to touch something | loc: elérni
  EN TS: A bear is reaching for a star.
  hu TS: Egy medve próbál elérni egy csillagot.
  EN FS: A bear is reaching for a bird.
  hu FS: Egy medve próbál elérni egy madarat.
  EN TP: reaching for a star
  hu TP: elérni egy csillagot
  EN FP: reaching for the honey
  hu FP: elérni a mézet
2059 | sunlight (noun): the light that comes from the sun | loc: napfény
  EN TS: Sunlight hits one side only.
  hu TS: A napfény csak az egyik oldalt éri.
  EN FS: Moonlight hits one side only.
  hu FS: A holdfény csak az egyik oldalt éri.
  EN TP: branches in bright sunlight
  hu TP: ágak erős napfényben
  EN FP: sunlight on the water
  hu FP: napfény a vízen
2060 | skis (noun): a pair of long narrow boards for moving on snow | loc: sí
  EN TS: Red and yellow skis, so cool.
  hu TS: Piros-sárga síléc, de menő.
  EN FS: Blue and white skis, so cool.
  hu FS: Kék-fehér síléc, de menő.
  EN TP: skis standing in the snow
  hu TP: hóban álló sílécek
  EN FP: skis on a car roof
  hu FP: sílécek egy autó tetején
2061 | galaxy (noun): a huge group of stars and glowing dust | loc: galaxis
  EN TS: The galaxy is showing off.
  hu TS: A galaxis nagyon felvág.
  EN FS: The moon is showing off.
  hu FS: A hold nagyon felvág.
  EN TP: a glowing purple galaxy
  hu TP: világító lila galaxis
  EN FP: a galaxy on a T-shirt
  hu FP: galaxis egy pólón
2062 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: egyensúlyozni
  EN TS: Someone balanced these stones.
  hu TS: Valaki egymásra egyensúlyozta ezeket a köveket.
  EN FS: Someone balanced these cups.
  hu FS: Valaki egymásra egyensúlyozta ezeket a csészéket.
  EN TP: stones balanced in a tower
  hu TP: toronnyá egyensúlyozott kövek
  EN FP: to balance on one leg
  hu FP: egy lábon egyensúlyozni
2064 | snow globe (noun): a glass ball with a tiny scene and snow inside | loc: hógömb
  EN TS: The snow globe has a church.
  hu TS: A hógömbben egy templom van.
  EN FS: The snow globe has a castle.
  hu FS: A hógömbben egy vár van.
  EN TP: a glowing snow globe
  hu TP: világító hógömb
  EN FP: a broken snow globe
  hu FP: törött hógömb
2067 | lamppost (noun): a tall street pole with a light on top | loc: utcai lámpa
  EN TS: One lamppost, lots of snow.
  hu TS: Egy utcai lámpa, rengeteg hó.
  EN FS: One lamppost, lots of rain.
  hu FS: Egy utcai lámpa, rengeteg eső.
  EN TP: a glowing lamppost
  hu TP: világító utcai lámpa
  EN FP: a dog by a lamppost
  hu FP: kutya egy utcai lámpánál
2068 | door (noun): the opening in a wall you enter or leave through | loc: ajtó
  EN TS: The red door is open.
  hu TS: A piros ajtó nyitva van.
  EN FS: The blue door is open.
  hu FS: A kék ajtó nyitva van.
  EN TP: an open red door
  hu TP: nyitott piros ajtó
  EN FP: a red garage door
  hu FP: piros garázsajtó
2069 | reindeer (noun): a large deer with antlers from the cold north | loc: rénszarvas
  EN TS: The reindeer had a bad flight.
  hu TS: A rénszarvasnak pocsék repülése volt.
  EN FS: The reindeer had a fun flight.
  hu FS: A rénszarvasnak szuper repülése volt.
  EN TP: reindeer stuck on a turbine
  hu TP: szélturbinán ragadt rénszarvas
  EN FP: reindeer pulling a sleigh
  hu FP: szánt húzó rénszarvas
2070 | electric guitar (noun): a guitar that needs an amplifier to be heard | loc: elektromos gitár
  EN TS: The electric guitar is a rocket!
  hu TS: Az elektromos gitár egy rakéta!
  EN FS: The electric guitar is sinking!
  hu FS: Az elektromos gitár süllyed!
  EN TP: an electric guitar taking off
  hu TP: felszálló elektromos gitár
  EN FP: an electric guitar on stage
  hu FP: elektromos gitár a színpadon
2071 | vintage (adjective): old but classic and high quality | loc: vintage
  EN TS: Nice vintage car, so festive.
  hu TS: Szép vintage autó, nagyon ünnepi.
  EN FS: Nice vintage van, so festive.
  hu FS: Szép vintage furgon, nagyon ünnepi.
  EN TP: a vintage red car
  hu TP: piros vintage autó
  EN FP: a vintage red dress
  hu FP: piros vintage ruha
2072 | cable (noun): a thick wire that carries power or data | loc: kábel
  EN TS: Cables cover the whole room!
  hu TS: Kábelek borítják az egész szobát!
  EN FS: Plants cover the whole room!
  hu FS: Növények borítják az egész szobát!
  EN TP: glowing blue cables
  hu TP: világító kék kábelek
  EN FP: cables on a bridge
  hu FP: kábelek egy hídon
2073 | shine (verb): to be bright by casting or reflecting light | loc: ragyogni
  EN TS: Look, the sun is shining in!
  hu TS: Nézd, a nap ragyog be!
  EN FS: Look, the moon is shining in!
  hu FS: Nézd, a hold ragyog be!
  EN TP: sunlight shining in
  hu TP: beragyogó napfény
  EN FP: moonlight shining in
  hu FP: beragyogó holdfény
2075 | windowsill (noun): the flat shelf at the bottom of a window | loc: ablakpárkány
  EN TS: Books sit on the windowsill.
  hu TS: Könyvek vannak az ablakpárkányon.
  EN FS: Cats sit on the windowsill.
  hu FS: Macskák vannak az ablakpárkányon.
  EN TP: books on a windowsill
  hu TP: könyvek egy ablakpárkányon
  EN FP: plants on a windowsill
  hu FP: növények egy ablakpárkányon
2076 | literature (noun): written works such as novels, poems and stories | loc: irodalom
  EN TS: So much literature, so little time.
  hu TS: Ennyi irodalom, ilyen kevés idő.
  EN FS: So many pizzas, so little time.
  hu FS: Ennyi pizza, ilyen kevés idő.
  EN TP: shelves of old literature
  hu TP: polcnyi régi irodalom
  EN FP: literature on a phone
  hu FP: irodalom telefonon
2077 | stare (verb): to look at something for a long time | loc: bámulni
  EN TS: The owl is staring at me!
  hu TS: A bagoly engem bámul!
  EN FS: The cat is staring at me!
  hu FS: A macska engem bámul!
  EN TP: staring at the viewer
  hu TP: a nézőt bámulva
  EN FP: staring at the moon
  hu FP: a holdat bámulva
2078 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: láng
  EN TS: Two flames light the book.
  hu TS: Két láng világítja meg a könyvet.
  EN FS: Three flames light the book.
  hu FS: Három láng világítja meg a könyvet.
  EN TP: two candle flames
  hu TP: két gyertyaláng
  EN FP: flames in a fireplace
  hu FP: lángok a kandallóban
2079 | wooden (adjective): made of wood | loc: fa
  EN TS: Everything here is wooden.
  hu TS: Itt minden fából van.
  EN FS: Everything here is plastic.
  hu FS: Itt minden műanyagból van.
  EN TP: tall wooden bookcases
  hu TP: magas fa könyvszekrények
  EN FP: tall wooden ladders
  hu FP: magas fa létrák
2080 | pagoda (noun): an Asian temple with tiered curved roofs | loc: pagoda
  EN TS: Snow is falling on the pagoda.
  hu TS: Hó hull a pagodára.
  EN FS: Rain is falling on the pagoda.
  hu FS: Eső hull a pagodára.
  EN TP: a red pagoda in snow
  hu TP: piros pagoda a hóban
  EN FP: a pagoda in the jungle
  hu FP: pagoda a dzsungelben
2081 | stepping stones (noun): flat stones you step on to cross water | loc: átkelőkövek
  EN TS: Stepping stones cross a lake.
  hu TS: Átkelőkövek vezetnek át egy tavon.
  EN FS: Stepping stones cross a road.
  hu FS: Átkelőkövek vezetnek át egy úton.
  EN TP: stepping stones across water
  hu TP: átkelőkövek a vízen át
  EN FP: stepping stones in a garden
  hu FP: átkelőkövek egy kertben
2082 | cane (noun): a thin stick you lean on while walking | loc: sétabot
  EN TS: He is holding a thin cane.
  hu TS: Vékony sétabotot tart.
  EN FS: He is holding a thin pipe.
  hu FS: Vékony pipát tart.
  EN TP: holding a walking cane
  hu TP: sétabotot tartva
  EN FP: a cane in the snow
  hu FP: sétabot a hóban
2084 | railway (noun): the line that runs trains for passengers | loc: vasút
  EN TS: A train on a wet railway.
  hu TS: Vonat egy esőáztatta vasúti pályán.
  EN FS: A train on a dry railway.
  hu FS: Vonat egy száraz vasúti pályán.
  EN TP: a railway at night
  hu TP: vasút éjjel
  EN FP: a railway in the desert
  hu FP: vasút a sivatagban
2086 | festive (adjective): cheerful and decorated for a celebration | loc: ünnepi
  EN TS: The street looks so festive!
  hu TS: Az utca olyan ünnepi!
  EN FS: The street looks so sunny!
  hu FS: Az utca olyan napos!
  EN TP: a festive snowy street
  hu TP: ünnepi havas utca
  EN FP: a festive dinner table
  hu FP: ünnepi vacsoraasztal
2087 | skyline (noun): the outline of a city against the sky | loc: városi látkép
  EN TS: A foggy steampunk skyline.
  hu TS: Ködös steampunk városi látkép.
  EN FS: A foggy desert skyline.
  hu FS: Ködös sivatagi városi látkép.
  EN TP: a skyline in the fog
  hu TP: városi látkép a ködben
  EN FP: a skyline at midnight
  hu FP: városi látkép éjfélkor
2088 | handsome (adjective): good-looking, used about a man | loc: jóképű
  EN TS: The handsome man has a beard.
  hu TS: A jóképű férfinak szakálla van.
  EN FS: The handsome man has glasses.
  hu FS: A jóképű férfinak szemüvege van.
  EN TP: a handsome bearded man
  hu TP: jóképű szakállas férfi
  EN FP: a handsome man with glasses
  hu FP: jóképű férfi szemüvegben
2089 | antlers (noun): the branching horns on a deer's head | loc: agancs
  EN TS: Man, those antlers are huge.
  hu TS: Haver, ez az agancs óriási.
  EN FS: Man, those antlers are tiny.
  hu FS: Haver, ez az agancs apró.
  EN TP: huge branching antlers
  hu TP: hatalmas elágazó agancs
  EN FP: antlers on the wall
  hu FP: agancs a falon
2091 | pine tree (noun): a tall tree with needles and cones | loc: fenyőfa
  EN TS: The pine tree stands alone.
  hu TS: A fenyőfa egyedül áll.
  EN FS: The palm tree stands alone.
  hu FS: A pálmafa egyedül áll.
  EN TP: a frosty pine tree
  hu TP: zúzmarás fenyőfa
  EN FP: a pine tree with lights
  hu FP: fenyőfa égősorral
2092 | fluffy (adjective): soft and light, like fur or feathers | loc: bolyhos
  EN TS: What a fluffy owl!
  hu TS: Micsoda bolyhos bagoly!
  EN FS: What a fluffy cat!
  hu FS: Micsoda bolyhos macska!
  EN TP: a fluffy blue owl
  hu TP: bolyhos kék bagoly
  EN FP: a fluffy blue blanket
  hu FP: bolyhos kék takaró
2093 | green (adjective): the color between blue and yellow | loc: zöld
  EN TS: The whole city is green.
  hu TS: Az egész város zöld.
  EN FS: The whole city is grey.
  hu FS: Az egész város szürke.
  EN TP: green towers full of trees
  hu TP: fákkal teli zöld tornyok
  EN FP: green paint on the towers
  hu FP: zöld festék a tornyokon
2095 | long (adjective): measuring a lot from one end to the other | loc: hosszú
  EN TS: Her long hair is teal.
  hu TS: A hosszú haja kékeszöld.
  EN FS: Her long hair is black.
  hu FS: A hosszú haja fekete.
  EN TP: long flowing teal hair
  hu TP: hosszú, lobogó kékeszöld haj
  EN FP: a long walk
  hu FP: hosszú séta
2096 | red (adjective): the color at the end of the spectrum | loc: piros
  EN TS: Even the sky is red!
  hu TS: Még az ég is piros!
  EN FS: Even the sky is green!
  hu FS: Még az ég is zöld!
  EN TP: a red desert sky
  hu TP: piros sivatagi ég
  EN FP: a red sports car
  hu FP: piros sportautó
2097 | ear (noun): the part of your head you hear with | loc: fül
  EN TS: Those ears are bigger than its head!
  hu TS: Azok a fülek nagyobbak, mint a feje!
  EN FS: Those eyes are bigger than its head!
  hu FS: Azok a szemek nagyobbak, mint a feje!
  EN TP: enormous round ears
  hu TP: hatalmas kerek fülek
  EN FP: ears under a hat
  hu FP: fülek egy sapka alatt
2099 | tree house (noun): a small hut built high up among branches | loc: lombház
  EN TS: This tree house is so cool!
  hu TS: Ez a lombház nagyon menő!
  EN FS: This dog house is so cool!
  hu FS: Ez a kutyaház nagyon menő!
  EN TP: a jungle tree house
  hu TP: dzsungelbeli lombház
  EN FP: a garden tree house
  hu FP: kerti lombház
2100 | gown (noun): a long formal dress worn to a ball | loc: báli ruha
  EN TS: Her gown is bigger than the garden!
  hu TS: A báli ruhája nagyobb, mint a kert!
  EN FS: Her hat is bigger than the garden!
  hu FS: A kalapja nagyobb, mint a kert!
  EN TP: a huge blue ball gown
  hu TP: hatalmas kék báli ruha
  EN FP: a gown on a hanger
  hu FP: báli ruha egy vállfán
2101 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: együtt
  EN TS: They are walking together.
  hu TS: Együtt sétálnak.
  EN FS: They are running together.
  hu FS: Együtt futnak.
  EN TP: walking close together
  hu TP: szorosan együtt sétálni
  EN FP: sitting together in a cafe
  hu FP: együtt ülni egy kávézóban
2102 | collection (noun): a large group of similar things kept together | loc: gyűjtemény
  EN TS: What a book collection!
  hu TS: Micsoda könyvgyűjtemény!
  EN FS: What a shoe collection!
  hu FS: Micsoda cipőgyűjtemény!
  EN TP: a collection of old books
  hu TP: régi könyvek gyűjteménye
  EN FP: a collection of old coins
  hu FP: régi érmék gyűjteménye
2104 | jewelry (noun): necklaces, earrings and rings that you wear | loc: ékszer
  EN TS: So much gold jewelry!
  hu TS: Mennyi arany ékszer!
  EN FS: So much silver jewelry!
  hu FS: Mennyi ezüst ékszer!
  EN TP: covered in gold jewelry
  hu TP: arany ékszerekkel borítva
  EN FP: selling gold jewelry
  hu FP: arany ékszereket árulni
2105 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: halom
  EN TS: The piles of books might fall.
  hu TS: A könyvhalmok bármikor ledőlhetnek.
  EN FS: The piles of cups might fall.
  hu FS: A csészehalmok bármikor ledőlhetnek.
  EN TP: leaning piles of books
  hu TP: dőlő könyvhalmok
  EN FP: a pile of clothes
  hu FP: egy halom ruha
2107 | spaceship (noun): a large vehicle that travels through space | loc: űrhajó
  EN TS: Where is everyone on this spaceship?
  hu TS: Hol van mindenki ezen az űrhajón?
  EN FS: Where is everyone on this train?
  hu FS: Hol van mindenki ezen a vonaton?
  EN TP: inside a spaceship
  hu TP: egy űrhajó belsejében
  EN FP: a spaceship landing
  hu FP: leszálló űrhajó
2108 | pipe (noun): a tube that carries water or gas | loc: cső | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Pipes run along the ceiling.
  hu TS: Csövek futnak a mennyezeten.
  EN FS: Wires run along the ceiling.
  hu FS: Vezetékek futnak a mennyezeten.
  EN TP: pipes along the ceiling
  hu TP: csövek a mennyezeten
  EN FP: pipes under the floor
  hu FP: csövek a padló alatt
2109 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: rendezett
  EN TS: The books stand in tidy rows.
  hu TS: A könyvek rendezett sorokban állnak.
  EN FS: The cups stand in tidy rows.
  hu FS: A csészék rendezett sorokban állnak.
  EN TP: tidy rows of books
  hu TP: rendezett könyvsorok
  EN FP: a tidy desk
  hu FP: rendezett íróasztal
2110 | silhouette (noun): a dark outline against a bright background | loc: sziluett
  EN TS: Dark silhouette, neon city. Batman?
  hu TS: Sötét sziluett, neonváros. Batman?
  EN FS: Dark silhouette, sunny beach. Batman?
  hu FS: Sötét sziluett, napos tengerpart. Batman?
  EN TP: a silhouette in a coat
  hu TP: kabátos sziluett
  EN FP: a silhouette of a cat
  hu FP: macska sziluettje
2112 | blazer (noun): a smart formal jacket worn over a shirt | loc: blézer
  EN TS: Her blazer is bright yellow.
  hu TS: A blézere élénksárga.
  EN FS: Her blazer is dark green.
  hu FS: A blézere sötétzöld.
  EN TP: a bright yellow blazer
  hu TP: élénksárga blézer
  EN FP: taking off a blazer
  hu FP: blézert levenni
2113 | yellow (adjective): the color between green and orange | loc: sárga
  EN TS: The flowers are bright yellow.
  hu TS: A virágok élénksárgák.
  EN FS: The flowers are bright purple.
  hu FS: A virágok élénklilák.
  EN TP: a dove on yellow flowers
  hu TP: galamb sárga virágokon
  EN FP: yellow flowers in a vase
  hu FP: sárga virágok egy vázában
2114 | across (preposition): from one side to the other side | loc: át
  EN TS: A bridge across the stream.
  hu TS: Híd ível át a patakon.
  EN FS: A bridge across the road.
  hu FS: Híd ível át az úton.
  EN TP: a bridge across a stream
  hu TP: patakon átívelő híd
  EN FP: a house across the street
  hu FP: ház az utca túloldalán
2115 | yoga (noun): calm stretching poses with slow breathing | loc: jóga
  EN TS: A calm yoga pose.
  hu TS: Nyugodt jógapóz.
  EN FS: A calm dance pose.
  hu FS: Nyugodt táncpóz.
  EN TP: a cross-legged yoga pose
  hu TP: törökülésben végzett jógapóz
  EN FP: yoga on a paddleboard
  hu FP: jóga egy SUP-deszkán
2116 | seaweed (noun): green plants that grow in the sea | loc: hínár
  EN TS: Seaweed is floating around her.
  hu TS: Hínár lebeg körülötte.
  EN FS: Plastic is floating around her.
  hu FS: Műanyag lebeg körülötte.
  EN TP: seaweed around her head
  hu TP: hínár a feje körül
  EN FP: seaweed on a sushi roll
  hu FP: hínár egy szusitekercsen
2117 | pocket watch (noun): a round watch carried on a chain | loc: zsebóra
  EN TS: No phone, just a pocket watch.
  hu TS: Telefon nincs, csak egy zsebóra.
  EN FS: No phone, just a wrist watch.
  hu FS: Telefon nincs, csak egy karóra.
  EN TP: a golden pocket watch
  hu TP: arany zsebóra
  EN FP: checking a pocket watch
  hu FP: zsebórára pillantani
2118 | fancy (adjective): decorated, expensive-looking and not plain | loc: elegáns
  EN TS: Such fancy golden shops!
  hu TS: Micsoda elegáns, aranyozott boltok!
  EN FS: Such fancy silver shops!
  hu FS: Micsoda elegáns, ezüstözött boltok!
  EN TP: fancy golden shopfronts
  hu TP: elegáns aranyozott kirakatok
  EN FP: a fancy dress party
  hu FP: jelmezbál
2119 | pattern (noun): a repeated design of shapes and colors | loc: minta
  EN TS: The owl has red patterns.
  hu TS: A baglyon piros minták vannak.
  EN FS: The owl has green patterns.
  hu FS: A baglyon zöld minták vannak.
  EN TP: feather patterns
  hu TP: tollminták
  EN FP: patterns on a dress
  hu FP: minták egy ruhán
2120 | perch (verb): to sit on a branch or a ledge, like a bird | loc: ágon ül
  EN TS: A bird is perched on a twig.
  hu TS: Egy madár egy vékony ágon ül.
  EN FS: A bird is perched on a wire.
  hu FS: Egy madár egy vezetéken ül.
  EN TP: perched on a blossom branch
  hu TP: virágzó ágon ül
  EN FP: perched on a window sill
  hu FP: ablakpárkányon ül
2121 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: nehéz
  EN TS: Heavy rocks, perfect balance.
  hu TS: Nehéz sziklák, tökéletes egyensúly.
  EN FS: Heavy bricks, perfect balance.
  hu FS: Nehéz téglák, tökéletes egyensúly.
  EN TP: a tower of heavy rocks
  hu TP: nehéz sziklákból álló torony
  EN FP: a heavy bag of rocks
  hu FP: nehéz zsák kövekkel
2123 | factory (noun): a building where machines make things | loc: gyár
  EN TS: This factory touches the sky.
  hu TS: Ez a gyár az eget súrolja.
  EN FS: This factory touches the sea.
  hu FS: Ez a gyár a tengert súrolja.
  EN TP: a giant steampunk factory
  hu TP: óriási steampunk gyár
  EN FP: a tiny steampunk factory
  hu FP: apró steampunk gyár
2124 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: út
  EN TS: She is walking on a wet road.
  hu TS: Egy nedves úton sétál.
  EN FS: She is walking on a wet beach.
  hu FS: Egy nedves tengerparton sétál.
  EN TP: walking down a country road
  hu TP: vidéki úton sétálva
  EN FP: driving down a country road
  hu FP: vidéki úton autózva
2126 | spill (verb): to let liquid fall out of a container | loc: kiönt
  EN TS: The kitten spilled the coffee!
  hu TS: A cica kiöntötte a kávét!
  EN FS: The kitten spilled the milk!
  hu FS: A cica kiöntötte a tejet!
  EN TP: spilled coffee on the table
  hu TP: kiöntött kávé az asztalon
  EN FP: spilling paint on the floor
  hu FP: festéket kiönteni a padlóra
2127 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: asztal
  EN TS: There is a book on the table.
  hu TS: Egy könyv van az asztalon.
  EN FS: There is a cat on the table.
  hu FS: Egy macska van az asztalon.
  EN TP: a carved wooden table
  hu TP: faragott faasztal
  EN FP: a table by the fire
  hu FP: asztal a kandalló mellett
2128 | shoot (verb): to hit something with a missile from a weapon | loc: lőni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is shooting from a chariot!
  hu TS: Harci szekérről lő!
  EN FS: He is shooting from a boat!
  hu FS: Csónakból lő!
  EN TP: shooting an arrow
  hu TP: nyilat lőni
  EN FP: shooting a photo
  hu FP: fotót lőni
2132 | abandoned (adjective): left empty and no longer used | loc: elhagyatott
  EN TS: The library is abandoned.
  hu TS: A könyvtár elhagyatott.
  EN FS: The school is abandoned.
  hu FS: Az iskola elhagyatott.
  EN TP: an abandoned library
  hu TP: elhagyatott könyvtár
  EN FP: an abandoned car
  hu FP: elhagyatott autó
2133 | pillar (noun): a tall upright post of stone | loc: oszlop
  EN TS: Stone pillars in the snow.
  hu TS: Kőoszlopok a hóban.
  EN FS: Stone pillars in the sand.
  hu FS: Kőoszlopok a homokban.
  EN TP: pillars of stacked stones
  hu TP: egymásra rakott kövekből álló oszlopok
  EN FP: a pillar of a temple
  hu FP: egy templom oszlopa
2134 | empress (noun): a woman who rules an empire | loc: császárnő
  EN TS: The empress is not amused.
  hu TS: A császárnőt ez egyáltalán nem mulattatja.
  EN FS: The empress is very amused.
  hu FS: A császárnőt ez nagyon mulattatja.
  EN TP: a stern empress
  hu TP: szigorú császárnő
  EN FP: an empress on a horse
  hu FP: császárnő lóháton
2135 | swirl (noun): a curling, spiral shape | loc: örvény
  EN TS: This cat is made of swirls.
  hu TS: Ez a macska örvényekből áll.
  EN FS: This cat is made of squares.
  hu FS: Ez a macska négyzetekből áll.
  EN TP: golden swirls
  hu TP: arany örvények
  EN FP: swirls of smoke
  hu FP: füstörvények
2136 | glove (noun): a covering for your hand with fingers | loc: kesztyű
  EN TS: The red gloves look great.
  hu TS: A piros kesztyű nagyon jól áll.
  EN FS: The blue gloves look great.
  hu FS: A kék kesztyű nagyon jól áll.
  EN TP: red space gloves
  hu TP: piros űrkesztyű
  EN FP: red boxing gloves
  hu FP: piros bokszkesztyű
2137 | halo (noun): a ring of light around a holy figure's head | loc: glória
  EN TS: Golden halo? Very stylish.
  hu TS: Arany glória? Nagyon stílusos.
  EN FS: Silver halo? Very stylish.
  hu FS: Ezüst glória? Nagyon stílusos.
  EN TP: a golden halo crown
  hu TP: arany glóriakorona
  EN FP: a halo of dark smoke
  hu FP: sötét füstglória
2139 | laser (noun): a narrow beam of strong light from a machine | loc: lézer
  EN TS: Laser beams glow behind her.
  hu TS: Lézersugarak világítanak mögötte.
  EN FS: Candles glow behind her.
  hu FS: Gyertyák világítanak mögötte.
  EN TP: neon laser beams
  hu TP: neon lézersugarak
  EN FP: a laser pointer for cats
  hu FP: lézermutató macskáknak
2140 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: gép
  EN TS: This place is one big machine.
  hu TS: Ez a hely egy nagy gép.
  EN FS: This place is one big garden.
  hu FS: Ez a hely egy nagy kert.
  EN TP: a huge rusty machine
  hu TP: hatalmas rozsdás gép
  EN FP: a huge washing machine
  hu FP: hatalmas mosógép
2141 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: pince
  EN TS: Something is glowing in the basement.
  hu TS: Valami világít a pincében.
  EN FS: Something is burning in the basement.
  hu FS: Valami ég a pincében.
  EN TP: an open basement door
  hu TP: nyitott pinceajtó
  EN FP: a basement full of boxes
  hu FP: dobozokkal teli pince
2143 | boulder (noun): a very large rounded rock | loc: sziklatömb
  EN TS: Boulders stacked like Lego.
  hu TS: Sziklatömbök egymásra rakva, mint a Lego.
  EN FS: Bricks stacked like Lego.
  hu FS: Téglák egymásra rakva, mint a Lego.
  EN TP: a tower of boulders
  hu TP: sziklatömbökből álló torony
  EN FP: a boulder rolling downhill
  hu FP: lefelé guruló sziklatömb
2144 | t-shirt (noun): a simple top with short sleeves and no collar | loc: póló
  EN TS: She has a white t-shirt on.
  hu TS: Fehér póló van rajta.
  EN FS: She has a black t-shirt on.
  hu FS: Fekete póló van rajta.
  EN TP: a white t-shirt and jacket
  hu TP: fehér póló és dzseki
  EN FP: a t-shirt on a hanger
  hu FP: póló egy vállfán
2146 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: Franciaország
  EN TS: France has a purple tower.
  hu TS: Franciaországban van egy lila torony.
  EN FS: France has a green tower.
  hu FS: Franciaországban van egy zöld torony.
  EN TP: a tower in France
  hu TP: torony Franciaországban
  EN FP: a bridge in France
  hu FP: híd Franciaországban
2149 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: gerinc
  EN TS: Ridge after ridge, all grey.
  hu TS: Gerincek egymás után, mind szürke.
  EN FS: Ridge after ridge, all green.
  hu FS: Gerincek egymás után, mind zöld.
  EN TP: rows of mountain ridges
  hu TP: hegygerincek sorai
  EN FP: a ridge covered in snow
  hu FP: hóval borított gerinc
2150 | ponytail (noun): hair tied back so it hangs like a tail | loc: lófarok
  EN TS: Ponytail up. She will go out there.
  hu TS: Lófarok megvan. Ki fog menni.
  EN FS: Hair down. She will go out there.
  hu FS: Haja kiengedve. Ki fog menni.
  EN TP: a ponytail at the window
  hu TP: lófarok az ablaknál
  EN FP: a ponytail on a horse
  hu FP: lófarok egy lovon
2151 | crescent (noun): the curved sliver shape of a moon | loc: holdsarló
  EN TS: The crescent moon is chilling.
  hu TS: A holdsarló chillel.
  EN FS: The full moon is chilling.
  hu FS: A telihold chillel.
  EN TP: a crescent moon in clouds
  hu TP: holdsarló a felhők között
  EN FP: a crescent moon at noon
  hu FP: holdsarló délben
2152 | lipstick (noun): colour you paint on your lips | loc: rúzs
  EN TS: Her lipstick is bright red.
  hu TS: A rúzsa élénkpiros.
  EN FS: Her lipstick is bright pink.
  hu FS: A rúzsa élénk rózsaszín.
  EN TP: bright red lipstick
  hu TP: élénkpiros rúzs
  EN FP: bright pink lipstick
  hu FP: élénk rózsaszín rúzs
2153 | china (noun): a very big country in East Asia | loc: Kína
  EN TS: China has a flying dragon!
  hu TS: Kínának repülő sárkánya van!
  EN FS: China has a sleeping dragon!
  hu FS: Kínának alvó sárkánya van!
  EN TP: a dragon from China
  hu TP: sárkány Kínából
  EN FP: a tiger from China
  hu FP: tigris Kínából
2154 | general (noun): a top military commander who leads an army | loc: tábornok
  EN TS: The general's beard is white.
  hu TS: A tábornok szakálla fehér.
  EN FS: The general's beard is black.
  hu FS: A tábornok szakálla fekete.
  EN TP: an old general in armour
  hu TP: öreg tábornok páncélban
  EN FP: a young general in armour
  hu FP: fiatal tábornok páncélban
